I also think it has to do with steel. I don't watch streams a lot but when I see fragments of on youtube he always seems very rude, same for his twitter. 
Sheepshead taste pretty much like catfish.
Part II http://vimeo.com/110548526  What a fascinating mind.
Yes it does give something away. I wish I could unwatch the trailer now.
Yeah, we have some lovely downvote fairies. So charming.
See also: Lazy man works twice as hard.
Some of their insurance is available to non-military, as well as some of their investment services. [Banking is only available to military, veterans, and eligible family members.](https://www.usaa.com/inet/pages/deposit_products_user_ineligible_complex_module) 
[Here she is, boys (and girls), the Dojo](http://i.imgur.com/Vb1mLI9.jpg?1).  PC &gt; TV for video  PC &gt; NuForce uDac2 &gt; Phase Linear 3300 series II preamp &gt; McIntosh MC2100 power amp &gt; Boston Acoustics A400 loudspeakers.  Turn it up.
Wow who is this?
From memory, yes.
i think that takes too much power out of our lineup. duffy seems like more of a utility guy than anything else. I almost think having both him and Arias is a little redundant.
not a biast title at all
Just arrived at my brothers apartment at school and starting our night with a fresh keg at their recently built bar. S is backlit into the barside. Costume tonight is either [a Ref](http://i.imgur.com/ujH7XeQ.jpg). Or a group costume of Spongebob characters, I'm [Mr. krabs](http://i.imgur.com/U4DPQyk.jpg). [Drink on Halloweeners!](http://i.imgur.com/sUzAkHW.jpg)
Will do. Banned.
TALOS IS THE ONE TRUE GOD OF MAN!
Well yeah, slashing a guy in the hand is one way to pick pocket the puck
Especially while playing! 
What Opie doesn't get is that going viral doesn't translate to popularity. It's in one ear and out the other with that stuff cause there's a new one every week.  I bet more people know him as "the cake stomp guy" than anything else. 
I think there's a difference between 'being creepy" and "seeming creepy".  Someone who's being creepy can normally control that behavior and deserves the criticism.  When someone "seems creepy" it's normally because of things that are outside of their control.
Sure, I have created a new post with it. You're free to download it.
Was schoolboy Q. Walked around school today yelling "gaahhhhhhh" to the people that knew and I carried around a bag of literal collard greens haha.
Holy fuck Datsyuk.
I actually think sharpwqt is full on asian, not sure. I'm filipino so it doesn't even really count for me.
Tee shirt tucked in to show off my bad fake Hermès belt :(  And matching the color of my shirt to the color of my shoes. 
I.... what? 
If this is what we're talking about...we need a new book even more than i thought we did
Well, I haven't seen [Rec] but Quarantine did scare the fuck out of me already...
I knew I was foolish to expect a better game tonight. Fuck we need Kopitar back so badly. 
The pedals have some silver alloy parts. :)
I have it right now, Magic +5 yes? It does almost 400 damage to the spellsword enemies per hit, the spear does 200 damage. I got a question, how does counter work? I mean how do I know someone made a counter? Is a parry a counter?
Je dois avouer que pour Vestibule ça allait, mais Ween = penser. oh la oh la la.
Жж=Žž it's basically a Zh. Though I can't remember atm where can you find it in English
In the US I played "Mr. Fox! Mr. Fox! What time is it?"
Love that Warhammer titan!
No problem.  Thanks for being the first one, my guinea pig, so-to-speak.  Lol.
I wouldn't go as far as 'much better.'
Not until you get a flair.
Yeah, ghosts don't do that. 
Yes. Yes you did
Sex in high school
You are brilliant, I'm going to implement this when I buy my home very soon.
Its amazing how many people who apparently consider themselves great drivers don't get this.
Oh, great.  Now I have another reason to be freaked out about flying.  *Thanks*.
Oops! Let me know if you're interested in the movie and I can give you the name. It's quite good even with the ending spoiled.
BTW, the livestream is here: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LhZ3hHVvkLE (Square's official channel). Only 360p though.
&gt;I dont benefit from hate crime laws. Because they will not be used if I am attacked because of my race.   Everything i typed and you still don't get that there *is precedent illustrating the courts protecting whites against racially motivated violence under hate legislation?* This isn't an opinion, it happens and has happened.  The courts prosecute criminals under hate crime legislation when any race-- including whites-- are violently targeted because of their ethnicity. How bizarre it must be to live in a world so warped that even actual court cases do nothing to convince you of how the world actually works? http://www.criminaldefenselawyer.com/resources/hate-crime-laws-protection.html  I don't know what else to say. Sorry being white sucks so hard.  Maybe you can figure out how the hundreds of millions of others like you have figured out how to do it?
my adv for halloween has been starship one by space jam   Thanks for the sale you guys! =)
Asleep by the Smiths. Such a sad song.
To be fair, I think a lot of the issues he had in those two games were a result of our line getting overwhelmed and having immediate pressure put on him. In the game against the Rams it seemed like he was hurried on nearly every single snap.
THIS CHANGES NOTHING
We have a bunch and not one kid came haha. This street is just too quiet...oh well. Like as if I need all this candy in my house!
Angels want a pitcher in return. Given they're in compete now mode, they'll like be interested in an experienced and proven arm. I wonder if Beurhle or Dickey would be enticing to them.
I definitely will craft this before the pumpkin because this looks so much nicer
Damn, and you were already 3 down.. 
The New Orleans is sinking thing was in the original.
To go with those classic moves of his, Hawk Spire and Hawk dive.
Who exactly?   This whole "eu best mids teehee" thing has been going on since season 2 and yet not a single time has any EU mid really stepped up and wow'ed a whole tournament. The closest thing was peke in s3 and he got took to the cleaners by wh1t3zz every game against Royal. 
8.1
Great, that's exactly what I needed!  Thanks allot for the help guys. 
right on man. thanks.
What a play by the magic man!
IMR level 32, EPM3 level 28.
... Is this the same Apollo sun conure that died? :(
One Cordell Cato please.
And Wang Fire.
The shifter got a push update from Shimano. Its a sign that you must get a new 11 speed cassette. 
Allman Brothers: it's their last tour together, see them if you can.  Wilco: most people should have heard of these guys, but if you're not listening to them start.  I know several professional musicians that love Tweedy and everything he does.  Umphrey's McGhee: great jam band. If I was a musician, I'd be one of these guys.  Bruce Katz: full disclosure, he's my father in law.  But he's a great blues musician on the piano and Hammond B3 organ.  His new song has a song called Amelia, which is names after my daughter.
What do you need sunscreen for? Nobody needs to defend against the Heat anymore.
&gt; I think the odd thing is that he seemingly has no take on the events himself. Someone who comes off as this dedicated to winning arguments strikes me as someone who would need their own theory.  I agree with this so much, I think this is one of the strangest things to me. Like, suppose you're Adnan and you're completely innocent, you literally had nothing to do with this whatsoever. Then some dude you sort of know fingers you in this incredibly elaborate story about your ex-gf's death, AND knows specific details about the crime (i.e. where to find her car) - what conclusion could you possibly draw except that Jay killed her? I really don't think that's a leap, but he never even suggests it.  This is why I think that even if Adnan didn't do it, he knows exactly what happened and for some reason doesn't want to say. I proposed somewhere upthread that there's some other criminal element that Adnan and Jay are both involved with, maybe a gang or a more serious drug ring or something (which would also explain why they seem to be closer than either of them wants to admit).
what is bumper jumper?
What I would REALLY like to see would be "Hogwarts: 1970's", with close attention to canon, Rowling involved as a consultant, and the characters would be from the generation of Lily and James Potter.
Not generally. You've still got football(American not soccer). 
Ok... ignoring all the problems with laws that have been voted in:  -many sentences are discretionary, this can vary by a LARGE amount.  -a "crime" is not always the same, even if some of the circumstances are the same. A prosecutor can offer to charge you with a lower degree of murder or manslaughter, for example. This benefits the accused as well as the prosecutor; there's a chance that the accused may serve NO time of the prosecutor cannot prove all the elements of the crime. This ensures criminals are off the streets for at least SOME time.  -As much as you may brush it off... it's a very expensive process.  Assuming you are american, I'm guessing you would also like lower taxes, if possible.  -It is a system that gets someone jailed for an extremely lengthy sentence for something the legislature never intended it be... you have a right to fight these accusations, but that right is essentially destroyed when your options are to accept a sentence (for a crime you didn't commit) or fight it with the possibility of a ridiculously long sentence  -not all crimes have mandatory sentences  Hope I helped answer your question at least a little bit. It's an extremely unfair system, and contributes to the US having the highest % of its citizens in jail. (Higher than any crazy dictatorship or any other country out there, yes.)
Or rejecting bills that the general public sees as bad for America. Often they seem to lack the connection to that general public and the voting demographics they represent; better decision making in general is what I want.
I'm sorrry D:!!!
No way he gets most improved. Coming off the bench like this
The Far Cry series
Please, please, :ccplease:, take 100 frigates and assosicated modules, assemble them, fit them all up yourself, put them on contract, and see exactly how unneedlessly painful that whole process is.  Two or three big requests:  A. When you right click a stack of hulls and assemble ship, please assemble them all.  We know how to split stacks if we only want one.  B. Allow us to fit multiple ships at once.  C. Allow eve saved fittings to include modules in cargo.
N64 and GameCube on Wii U VC
I know, pretty sweet right? Smoking weed right in front of a cop. 
totally counts as a performance. I too performed in school gyms through grade 7-12. Now I'm in a band and we play gigs every now and then at showrooms/ bars and i would definately say that the experience i got from playing in talent shows/ performances in high school helped me get to where i am today. if i had an advice to give you, do as many performances as you can throughout highschool, performing isnt always free so take as many as you can get!
I'll say. You have some strange fantasies missy.
Thanks, Petey, for not yakking blood every so often.
Definitely one of my favorite horror movies. Gritty and fucked up but presenting it as a documentary keeps it from feeling like just another torture porn movie.  As I understand it, it had a very limited release and was never released on DVD. Pretty much have to torrent it or find it on a streaming site. I watched in Youtube awhile ago, dunno if it's still available there.
Why isn't my PWG match listed in the Promotional by the numbers!? 
That looks like a great setup! Interesting design, that is one fat bucket. I'm glad you're bringing some peppers into the community :D Can't wait to see how they react to the LED light, I'm guessing you will be making a whole lot of hot salsa.  I have uploaded your grower profile into the website, you can check it out at www.spacebuckets.com/u/oscilator. Hope thats OK! I can update the pics when the UFO arrives and/or when you keep upgrading your setup.  Many cheers
You can't sell a non-personalised plate - so you can't sell H982 FKL, but you can sell H1VAE.  Every UK car gets a non-personalised registration number - in this case it is H982 FKL. This remains with the car forever.   If you buy a personalised registration (like a "vanity plate" in the US), either from the government or from someone else (they're transferrable like that), then you can have that number put onto any car you own. In that case, the registration number is changed to the personalised number but the old one is still recorded.  If you then decide to transfer the number to another car (eg you're selling it) then the government reactivates the old number to free up the personalised number.  Non-personalised registration numbers don't change when you sell the car, it's not like the US where you may be required to get new plates. Personalised plates can be sold with the car but many people like to keep them and transfer them onto their new car (or sell it separately, good numbers sell for megabucks at auctions and privately)
I'm going to try and get to every EarthBound song eventually :)
Probably not at all given that she's dead. 
What's the catch? Are you going to try and put a finger in someone?
Checkout r/keto? That is one of the worst places on earth for anyone skeptical about keto, to read about keto. It's full of misinformation and stupidity.  It's a sub full of mostly obese people that have tried every 'diet' there is, and are now 'going keto' in an attempt to finally get their weight under control.  Just because some fats are healthy does not mean all foods that are high in fat are automatically healthy.. that's the part it seems most of these people don't understand. "well if walnuts and fatty salmon are healthy.. that means deep fried bacon dipped in ranch dressing with a glass of heavy cream must be healthy too!" seems to the mentality of the average r/keto'er
Most popular prank channels on youtube are fake, see vitalyzdtv.
Keep telling yourself that, sugah.  &lt;:)
Now i am thinking about going with i7-4790k. They have different models that have it and i will be able to put that $200 to get gtx 980 instead of 970. also for memory, am reading the differences between the 2600 and 2133 isn't that great. Is it better to get a bigger case with high performance case fan with "expensive" water cooling? My thought is bigger case means more room for air... that is why i am going with full case or even i may go with the bigger case.
Ks doesn't bother me much. Unless they then thing they are better than you. Example.   I'm playing as Apollo  My teammates Vulcan  Apollo unloads everything Vulcan uses his one to take the kill 'Happens a few more times' Later Apollo dies KD 3-6 Vulcan: Stop feeding. God it's so hard to play with idiots! 
Where is this located?
Bolin needs to learn that as soon as you get in trouble, lava-bend at the problem. Don't save it for later.
U cute doe
I don't see anything that makes it 'clear' he doesn't want to be an engineer. He's smarter than you to recognise that he needs the break in order to pursue his dream.
The only thing I can think of is Clementine from Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind.
Naturally.
I'm a freelance audio-visual technican but would love to spend some time playing music on tour, even just as a backing musician. Not really sure how to get into it though.... And I don't do bus sleeping...!! A cheap hotel will do me fine, but it can't be moving....!!
Agreed. I think that you have to differentiate between things that moderately bother them and those things that change their whole attitude for hours at a time. I can tell her NO and OH WELL a lot and do. Like, if she has something in her hand she shouldn't have, I ask her to "trade" for something else, but if she refuses, I'll just take it away from her and let her cry. However, this type of thing doesn't change her attitude for hours on end.  But yeah, this has all started happening in the last two weeks. It seems like she has changed in some way. The difference being that she has something specific in mind that she remembers which wasn't the case before.
I've done this for my daughter for a few years now :) Most recently I sent her an email and pictures of the first tooth she lost and what the "Tooth Fairy" brought her. Love this idea! 
That would be classed as unarmed, but you also need the body enhancements sub licence
Exactly. The Yogscast takes care of maps.
Casually. I don't watch a lot but I have watched Death Note, AoT, and Naruto back in the day. I've been like on my third episode of FMA Brotherhood for two weeks but I'll probably end up watching it all, maybe.
S1 - Suzuka  S2 - Silverstone  S3 - Interlagos
This isn't 4chan.
Charities keep 99%, 1% goes to some other charity.
I have 10 hours on mine today with 3 hours 20 minutes of screen time and I am at 46%.   Edit: WiFi on and used part of the day.  Bluetooth on all day. 1 hour of phone calls.  Waze for about 45 minutes.  
Quit your bullshit. 
Well, I've achieved this with at least 3 games.
No problem at all and thanks. \^-\^
Every Ork player I know just cuts panels out of plasticard.
how did you make it? was there a lot of math involved? or trial and errors?
Maneuver kills.  If I fire near someone, and they dodge into the ground or stall, that should be a kill, even if I didn't score a hit.  If I can make a Zero so greedy for a kill that it snaps it's wings, that should be a kill.  It can start out with very simple implantation: if an enemy crashes, award teammates within 1.5km kills and assists.  This will also award players that do the hard work of chasing down an enemy, even if they bail out intentionally crash.
Too bad she got a boob job.
[Here ya go.](http://www.100fps.com/how_many_frames_can_humans_see.htm)
The secret to re-playability is the roguelike mode. If they work on that and really up the RNG/replayability I could see it getting a decent Binding of Isaac-like following.
[SnapShot](http://www.redditlog.com/snapshots/1237985)  (mirror | [open source](https://github.com/mintyminer/redditbots) | [create your own snapshots](http://redditlog.com))
You can make yourself "presentable" yes but going to the gym isn't going to give you Johnny Depp's face, that's down to genetics.  You don't even have to be fit to be a fashion model, just thin, and you can be thin and have an average/unattractive face. 
From what I've been told, wouldn't it look better to start off at a University or other highly regarded school even if it means taking out loans? After school,  wouldn't you have a higher guarantee of securing a higher paying job and eventually paying off the loans? 
I want to hear more about this. 
Honey Apple Shocktop
*Aww yiss*
Each maneuver of the craft takes a certain amount of delta-V, whether it is an Earth to LEO launch or a change in orbit. Each kilogram of mass that goes to Mars ultimately has to first be launched to LEO, which is the largest delta-V in the entire mission. Delta-V costs fuel.  Yes, it is true that traveling from LEO to Mars takes less fuel than to travel from Earth's surface to LEO. That should be pretty obvious. But you can't say "oh we're using less fuel because we launched from space" when you have to launch all that fuel into LEO in the first place - each stage of the mission doesn't happen in a vacuum. Each extra kilogram that ultimately goes to Mars represents an exponential increase in fuel at every stage back to the launch pad on Earth.
The full movie is on YouTube for free if you search it out!   *edit, well it used to be...
Sounds like he's starting. Munchie also playing, plus he's a captain for his home town game. 
How did you make that perfect VHS tape filter?
I've mentioned The Lovin' Spoonful before but hardly anybody knows that it exists. My cousin Chris does and my Mom but like nobody else
exactly the BIG. BAD. BROWN PEOPLE!
That was one jacked Satan
I know. But the way people spam gold shells there is (almost) no reason to buy slow well armored tanks. Just take some medium and enjoy
lol.
yeah I'd made the BusiMaps system that helps companies organize all the documents and info that surround every business step. I'd presented it to governments, hospitals, multi-nationals and the key take-out I got was automation of the workforce because it lets you see all the steps that humans do with the systems they use. As a convo topic, it's great with those who are in management and administration because it helps their world, but I never talk about it in social settings, I'd made a different system for that.   I guess one of the most effective convo topics started by me asking what their hobbies were, and going deeper into how they use that enjoyment to do their daily work. One lady loved jigsaw puzzles (be husband hated them), but she enjoyed piecing all the parts together to make the picture. I linked that to her job as an accountant (which she hated) and she found a whole new way to look at it. She called me up a week later and said she now looks at her work as parts of the corporate puzzle, and now putting the corporate pieces together is fun for her, she has found she likes her job more.
he reminds me a fucked up 10year old i used to take care of at a troubled youths home. 
Redditch is fun
All IMGUR images get reported at least once, because the bot reports all of them so we're sure to look at them.
You'd hate me so much. My friends and I have a new saying every couple of days. The most recent is "posting up on the block."
Great series. You have had three hours, all caught up yet? I normally read them at work on smoke breaks, but I have Rantarian saved on my friends list for easy stalking.
Coming from a person that is in your kids generation (im a freshman) things have changed, guys i'm sorry but kids aren't as nice anymore.You and your son teaming up to invite them to a birthday party just doesn't work these days.TRYING SO HARD to be funny makes you not funny instantly.This is just the point of view and some tips from a person growing up in this day of age.  If he has no friends or if hes weird get him to change his style(also personality but thats up tp you guys),or let him be with the weird kids in high school,but he has to change.People who TRY to be funny (key word "try") are the most annoying people these days.I'm sorry but this is a cruel time to be a kid/pre teen if you're like the way your son is.  I'm sorry if this came off disrespectful i really don't mean any disrespect but i'm just giving you up tp date advice. 
Gah fine
Lost 16 keys, gained 6 keys. Hopefully I'll recover from it before the week ends.
How is it different from asking how many people are asleep at any one time, or how many people are eating at any one time?
Big fat positive  Pregnancy test :)
Don't leave us hanging. You did use your hand? 
tfw not going to any parties, no costume  tfw gonna be cozy and watch Netflix 
Someone once ask for A similar file size for poster printing from my images. When the printer request 1800 dpi you should really divided it by 3, since every computer pixel consist of 3 dots in a printer. Even at 600 dpi it still is over kill for poster size prints, but I think your computer can manage that.
Don't worry, life...uhh...finds a way.
I wreck fools at checkers, come at me bro
that looks just so cartoonishly super-villain-like. especially if you consider the time.
most anthony player
After having a 17", I can't even use a 15" anymore. I have a 14" at work (of course I have two 22" external monitors on it to actually use it...) and whenever I have to work from home with it, it's almost unbearable to use. Hard to read unless I'm hunched over it, not enough screen real estate as a developer, etc.  For me, 17" is the absolute minimum I can use anymore for a laptop. The eyes just aint what they used to be, and it's more comfortable to use.
You don't say twat the way we do though, it sounds weird.
&gt;Really proud you didn't shit your pants in church brother.  Can someone please make this into a card? Cause this should be made into a card
This look like it was rendered on a potato...
Wisdom -&gt; Ivanovic  Downing -&gt; Sigurdsson
Dude, I cannot even imagine how seriously terrible that is.  It is on the order of tugging a girls mustache...  I mean you no offense, but as a man who struggles with his weight at times, I completely empathize with the torment of the man boob. I am sorry you had to endure that sort of physical harassment. I mean you doing the same to them would have to be something that publicly hurts their sense of femininity in a way that shames them for it at the same time.  Fuck those nasty excuses for humans. 
yes
DAE DLC SUX?????? 
No you're just a moron.
**Rei** ___ She looks at the ground as he takes the photo, then when she looks back up he was setting fire to it, burning her photo... Her mouth opens and she reaches forward, her eyes going wide.. She doesn't even know how to react as she reaches forward, reaches for the ashes of her photo.. The only photo she had of her parents, her hand reaches to the burning photo, trying to grab hit, her hand burning slightly as she tries to pick it up, but it crumples under her touch, the fire dying out before it could do any serious damage to her skin... There's tears in her eyes now as she looks back up at him... "S-S... Souji... W-why...."
Why can't I hold all these owls?:)
That's some sweet interaction there between deflecting palm and the dictate. It helps take the downside away from dictate. The blue red counter burn spell could be fun with the dictate as well.
got 1 token for my ESL one booster, and then suddenly I got 2 more. confuzzled.
Anachronistic
1 hour left to my special livestream!
It was a bad post when it was OC
It would be horrible, only good for those with ir others would be destroyed by ghosts in the dark
10$ for the dress 30$ for alterations 30$ for the wig 35$ for the gloves and tights 30$ for the crown and gem 17$ for the shoes 16$ for the purse 125$ for the makeup  so just under 300 bucks. :P ouch...
Just want to get more info. Why do you think flirting is where you fall flat?  I believe that if you are also flirting in a charming way you won't be labelled as that guy. If you are, who cares?  
Los Cerritos, CA. 128GB TMobile Plus. Now it's not showing in stock. hrm.
I'm more interested in a skilltree that has several skills boosting the SMGs.
This makes me think of the Golden Gate Bridge, which everyone thinks is red but is actually International Orange.
[it might be this?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-2GmzyeeXnQ)
If I see someone who is an obvious novice and they are doing something dangerous I'll usually try to casually make some suggestions.  If it is some yolo trying to ego lift then I just let nature take its course.
http://imgur.com/a/qmFO7  ;)!!
Dizzy!
Well today was your perfect opportunity.
aw ye
Well this is good news :-). Glad Grack straightened out enough to be welcomed back to EG.  Let's see how this plays out! ;-)
You're best mod.
The main advantage of 970 and 980 cards is the new maxwell architecture.  -Better performance per processing core  -Improved power consumption  -New features geared toward 4k and virtual reality use  -more memory  But the 780 is not a bad card.  I would personally recommend waiting till the next generation unless you really have a need for it.
*she grins* It was.
Oh, instead of posting the same comment I'll just reply to yours for fist-bump.
GOD DAMMIT I PAID GOOD MONEY FOR THIS COSTUME
For Android users:  - Say, "Okay Google" - When prompted, say "What is this song?"
Ya... I have like a whole bag of really old drugstore makeup I could get rid of... Not sure if that counts though :) I'm not sure what's in it for them? 
I know right...Fuck me.
Didn't you see the post where Kelby admitted in the clg subreddit that it was dexter' personality that didn't match
The majority of that entire update is dedicated to the melee issue that plagued Halo 3 for months.  I remember that and I remember the patch they had that fixed it.  Aka you melee someone and chances are you both die at the same time, even if it looked like you melee'd first.  
Seems to be a pretty significant divide between CLG and Curse as well.  Really, it's just that nobody dislikes Dig, I think.
She's a ginger,..
lose to fucking sk, claim could have made it to the finals
He King and Foley should team up do do a comic book 
Everything is cool when you're part of a team!
*she laughs*  Are you joking? No. 
I locked myself in my bedroom and gave my roommates my car keys so I couldn't go buy a pack on a whim.  I had a bulk 2 lb bag of pistachios, a bunch of DVDs and PC games, some hard candy, regular gum and nicotine gum.  I basically detoxed myself for 4 days.. it was a long weekend and I didn't have to go to work.  Every time I got a craving, I'd eat some pistachios.  Which, just like having a meal, made me want a cigarette even more.  I would just recognize the cravings when they happened and mentally keep track of how long them would take to pass.  Sometimes they were so intense I felt like my body was practically shaking.  I chewed the nicotine gum whenever I felt like like I was doing well, not when I was having cravings, since I didn't want to reward those feelings.  By the end of those four days, I was ninety percent better.  I went back to work, brought more gum and pistachios with me and was able to control my cravings.  I didn't have any serious impulses to go buy a pack.  It's been around ten years now.  Those four days was so miserable, I didn't want to ever relive them by starting to smoke again. 
I was screening for new roommates and one of the questions was if they watched HTGAWM. I love it. Viola Davis is so beautiful and I think I might be in love with Connor. I always imagined meeting a guy like that in law school. 
It's just consistent templating to avoid future confusion. See [[Dryad Arbor]].
That was pretty hot to listen to! Thank you for creating and posting it here. :)
You will! It took me a long time myself. 
IEM is not a for fun tourney wtf? Did you just start watching league? IEM has some of the best games ever played.
I don't know if it's just me, but I find two very well placed shots with the P250 on an fully-bought enemy much more satisfying. 
That and normally the arguments here are the same as the ones in the drama only better (as in better points and stuff, no more drama).   *Normally*.
Confirmed: http://forums.keenswh.com/post/dedicated-server-01-054-009-unable-to-queue-production-in-assemblers-7154307?pid=1284936056#post1284936056
Hey, that sort of happened to me once, I went to a fancy dress party and was meeting other friends who were also going to show up in matching Star Trek TNG outfits... my ~~friends~~... the bastards also "forgot"... :/
I thought the same after watching the anime and then I read the manga and had a much better time. The anime is all jumbled and you can't really tell what's going on (still a good anime, though). I thought the plot in the manga was presented much better than in the anime. I didn't watch Highschool DxD yet, though, so I can really say whether it's better or not.
Agreed. I sleep through phone calls. That app better open the speaker and let the waker speak. Now that would work. 
I've bookmarked as well! Thank you!
$3M buyout if I remember correctly. Hopefully he re-signs on a small, incentive laden deal. I like Bills even if he never became the true ace we were hoping for.
Är inte det bara lagligt om man är en prorysk rebell?
&gt; "amoral sexual strategy."  Wait, do they actually call it that? Who the fuck thinks it's okay to be amoral?
Seriously, it's not even a question, it's common sense.
Yeah but it there crazy input lag in real life? Do people defend like they are on ice constantly?
HOW CAN SOMETHING BE SO HYPE.   TEAM CHILLMAN!
I bet there exists a question about metal music for which this answer, word for word, would be a valid one. 
We'll give it a whirl and see what happens! Thanks!
He said he never liked SC2. His dislike for the game extends to the people who made it. He likes Heroes. I don't see any contradictions.
Yeah I definitely agree. From this point forward I'm going to make it clear that my opinions are my own and not some sort of blanket statement. It's shitty that some people can take one person's opinion and try to apply it to a group for the sake of argument.
░░░░░░░░░░░░▄▐ ░░░░░░▄▄▄░░▄██▄ ░░░░░▐▀█▀▌░░░░▀█▄ ░░░░░▐█▄█▌░░░░░░▀█▄ ░░░░░░▀▄▀░░░▄▄▄▄▄▀▀ ░░░░▄▄▄██▀▀▀▀ ░░░█▀▄▄▄█░▀▀ ░░░▌░▄▄▄▐▌▀▀▀ ▄░▐░░░▄▄░█░▀▀ U HAVE BEEN SPOOKED BY THE ▀█▌░░░▄░▀█▀░▀ ░░░░░░░▄▄▐▌▄▄ ░░░░░░░▀███▀█░▄ ░░░░░░▐▌▀▄▀▄▀▐▄SPOOKY SKILENTON ░░░░░░▐▀░░░░░░▐▌ ░░░░░░█░░░░░░░░█ ░░░░░▐▌░░░░░░░░░█ ░░░░░█░░░░░░░░░░▐▌
That was simply fantastic! I would read a book/watch a series based on this premise. Very well done!
Event horizon would fit too.
This is kind of unrelated to gaming but a lot of times when I go to tell somebody to throw something away I say can you delete this.
I don't use client software.
Asian
Reminds me of 40 years ago when it was Halloween candy laced with LSD. Also never happened. 
Not sure, maybe?
I've heard of it, but never gotten to go to it. I live on the opposite side of the state. Our Mardi Gras is fun, but I've always wanted to drive down to NO for it.
DO be careful with my Royal Doulton with the hand-painted periwinkles!
troll2 trōl/  verb gerund or present participle: trolling  Fish by trailing a baited line along behind a boat. "we trolled for mackerel" ;-)
Scaled Composites, who designed and build the craft, is actually owned by Northrop Grumman these days. The Virgin Galactic outfit is a front for the investment arm of the government of Abu Dhabi, Branson is just the PR and Sales face of the company. So behind the scenes the entire show is old school defense contractors and Arab oil money.   But yeah the entire idea of strapping that much power onto your ass and hoping it will work has been questioned by some people from day one. Given the exhaust is supersonic the engine really is a form of controlled explosion.  Note the dates here, http://www.knightsarrow.com/rockets/scaled-composites-accident/
I wanna different strokes his beard.
Short money for unsanf denim.  Anyone here try red cloud out before?
I don't say "eh" after everything I say, I don't sound like bob and doug mckenzie, and I dont like maple syrup that much - Canadian
That had to hurt D:
hahahaa it's AWESOME!!! :D
Yeah I probably have him in 30% of my Thursday lineups. Might hedge against him in my Sunday lineups just because of that.
Ok then.
driving a german whip
I'd just like to add to the discussion that i've had personal experience Playing with @Tryndamere. I was lucky enough to que up and he landed on my team. (IGN Mrpowerbottom) he was playing Udyr Jungle at the time. I just wanted to express how pleasant my experience playing with you was. After the game we added each other and duo qued for a few wins. I just think it is really cool that you are so down to earth, there is just something surreal about queing up with a company head and playing a few ranked games. I work in quality assurance myself and let me just tell ya that you gained a loyal fan, customer and supporter of company mostly because you were so real and genuine in game and just had fun playing with you as another stranger over the internet. Which made me take a step back and look at the times where i have gotten frustrated in game and remember that this thing we call online gaming should be utilized to build friendships, rapport, and teamwork with strangers over the internet. We have a mental escape from the real world, from our stresses, our anxieties, and our problems. Anyway Thanks for being just another gamer and keep up the good work!
Remember when our defense out scored Aaron Rodgers? Me too.   Even without Bush being back, we still have Bell and Riddick who looks very promising, as does George Winn. You run d is your run d. Our run d is OK I suppose too. ;).   It's going to be cold, and probably a night game since it's likely to decide the division champ. Your strong suit is your passing game, which will be harder. This game will be won in the trenches, and ours is better.   If we are going to win in GB, 8 games in, this is the year to do it. That luck we have never had has been on our side too. 
Good timeout. 
~~I have three NA ORAS codes to give away. Tell me your favorite pokemon and why.~~  ~~Also, if you have a spare Diancie code, we can trade. :)~~  All gone!
report back!
Will link my stuff [here] (https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/1GVtwc5bY0cpPJb-nHY5t81Mvp6UGUfjmxzvB6l1y34A/edit#gid=1689016747) I suppose
"Better than most of the people here with less brain cells than clothing."
Yeah not only is GS a contender, but they are contending in what is possibly the strongest division in NBA history (when everyones not injured). We were looking AMAZING against them. Then Boogie got frustrated and 1 quick third quarter fouls, and we tried to run small ball against the spalsh brothers...with Rudy and Boogie on the bench.
Yeah, I can see why you would say that. I do agree this sub is quite colorless. I just prefer to focus on content (links/text) instead of background. If there were some kind of button that let us switch between the logos, that would be perfect!
ask the others I apparently know nothing haha
95
depending on where you live and your needs it might be a lot or might be nothing. Tips, shop in bulk. Get kgs of rice/pasta/chicken breast like I do, saves you over 100$/month per person if done right.  I spend around 500 - 600$ a month on myself, but I eat what you two probably eat put together.
Yah, California &amp; Arizona are both the biggest consuming culprits &amp; most dependent states.   **California**: Most of the public assumes that California has plenty of freshwater on it's own, but this is entirely not the case. California has very little freshwater, and has been dipping into the Colorado River's "surplus" since the beginning of the compacts creation in order to satisfy its increasing population. I'll take this time to mention that between 1905-1922 (when the scientists were analyzing the river &amp; setting the allocation conditions) the river was at a period of "abnormally high rainfall". Couple that with incorrect measuring &amp; data analyses and you get a recipe for disaster... or inevitable drought.  **Arizona**: I love living in Arizona, but society really wasn't meant to set-up camp in the lower portions of the state. Southern cities rely on canal systems (like the CAP that I mentioned in the original comment) to deliver the reserved water to their region. Without being able to transfer this reservoir water millions of people would be forced to live in exactly what southern Arizona naturally is... a desert. 
But, I'm buying carpet dammit
What other series?
I read the title as 100$ million combination lock, and thought to myself why didn't he steal the combination lock instead.
Or maybe you're just being overly sensitive... I wonder which one happens on Reddit more often.
Thanks for looking out for me!
&gt;No, I headcanoned it that way because the alternative made no sense to me at all.  Well of course it made no sense to you, *how could wonderful, flawless Ami ever act in a way that wasn't perfect?*  (but really I'm just poking fun because we went from "Urawa never calls her! Oh wait that's in character" to "Ami never calls him! Oh obviously all this stuff happened offscreen", your explanation was actually perfectly reasonable)  &gt;Portmanteaus are the only avenue available   But... it was a portmanteau? Just with their surnames because I didn't like Amako. Although I appended Maru because I looked up a more appropriate affix than S.S. for a Japanese ship, but then I *forgot to delete S.S.* Whoops.  &gt;They just take things, because regardless of how they feel about the humans in relation to themselves, they also feel perfectly content in doing that and not seeing the harm.  Thing is, I was mostly just joking about it in last week's thread, but they've been thwarted by the senshi a couple times now and never seem to even consider that maybe the direct approach isn't working so well. After all, they keep reminding us that their lives are on the line, so it seems odd that we're required to mostly infer their pigheadedness. I don't mind your interpretation but I want more from the aliens that is *alien*. Admittedly, later in the episode we did actually get some of that, what with the "Love is something you take by force", so if we get more of that sort of material I'll probably stop grumbling.   &gt;Am I sensing a spin-off to Pose Critics?  Maybe? We kinda don't get to see them in their civvies all that often so it would need to be an intermittent event. And Rei would always win.
&gt;You started it  What is this, second grade?  &gt;1880 calories for lunch, and that's not some unreasonable bullshit I came up with on my own, that's just picking a number off the list and agreeing to the upgrades.  You are saying that you are picking a 1300 calorie meal and agreeing to upgrades to get to 1880.  YOU are choosing to upgrade. I say no every time. Sorry if that makes me a prick for telling you to grow a spine
I feel like sad lonely people tend to watch *more* romance shows.  Source: me.  Also MALgraph says the only yuri show I watched was... Mnemosyne. Which I doubt is representative of the genre.
You come off as such a despicable parasite.
Source button? Do you mean to view the whole source code of the website?
You must.  Just once.  Oh, never mind.
Dat font.
Team Sleep should be higher up on the known list I would think
Don't ever tell her you cyber stalked her. It will come across as creepy. She will likely not be impressed.   Just ask her to lunch or to get some coffee/tea. Doesn't have to be a huge production. You don't need to tell her you like her. Just come across as confident and show interest in who she is as a person. 
[Martin Keown](http://1.bp.blogspot.com/_NT4qoZMOxxw/TUtOnPAPQqI/AAAAAAAAANk/krI3WSjMSUs/s1600/Martin-Keown.jpg)
Fair enough.
Ireland or Philippines? This could honestly fit a lot of countries 
...where did I imply anything should be banned?
Wikipedia says it was [Vincent Price](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thriller_%28song%29)
Yeah that's a bit of word play.  What's really intended to be said is, "I'm not like the stereotype of the prototypical modern young male."  It doesn't help that when there is a group of men who don't know each other too well, the interaction tends to be based on stereotypical male things.  It's like the social fraternizing safety net.  Often times men in situations where they're around mostly or exclusively other men of the same age group who don't know each other will try to establish a common denominator so they go for the typical 'man' stuff.
Can't handle the truth can you?
"Well.. I have the tails too..'
In order of having heard of them: Foo Fighters, Jimmy Eat World, Warner Drive and Mini Bosses. 
Oh my god. What brand of wipes were you using?
That's an interesting point. It's definitely the deepest position today imo. 
The guy threw a potato salad party that had live music. Also, almost all of the money went to charity. It started out retarded but turned into something cool.
http://sketchtoy.com/63500127  Please rate  I was on mobile
"allegedly born" 
Literal metaphorical riots.
It is actually marginally better than the 290X in most cases
It depends tbh. Destiny is growing his YouTube presence. He may want to retain that content, esp since the D3 stuff was on Own3d and they screwed him out of his money.  I will probably contact him to see how he feels about it.   It would be cool if i can get the content to him so he could host it on his own channel and earn a lil bit of cash for it. They screwed him up so hard.   Again we will see, i will keep you updated.  (ok im done for the night, enjoy people)  btw its like 60 hours of Diablo III
Connecting now 
i lol'd hard
Mechanical keyboard are amazing and definitely worthwhile if you spend enough time typing or gaming.
Well then ... Probably not accidental. For shame!
&gt;Kappa versions would be tight  Every stage is wario ware, with mini-games. Kappa
Courtney Lee, be okay please
GBA4IOSAPPS.COM download the app and play game boy advanced and color roms on your phone. Super fun and their are a ton of games. Apple removed it from the app store so you have to get it from the website. 
&gt; The geography excuse doesn't cut it there.  Agreed and if you can't do the whole country, well, start with the cities. Do *something*.
Monster Hunter 4 Ultimate 
Yeah my mom told me she shopped it afterwards. I was not happy.
Chances are Sato's current designed is paying homage to Hayao Miyazaki.
[One of these games?](https://i.imgur.com/g99gB1U.jpg)
Well all of that assumes different things, e.g. how it was explained to them, their frame, physical attractiveness.   Yeah, obviously if an awkward guy angrily went on a TRP tirade full of judgement, slut-shaming, and negativity the reaction is going to be bad (that's one end of the spectrum).  However a good scenario is a conversation between a guy and a gal where, maybe they're talking about a relationships one of her girlfriends is in, and he shows that he's aware of how it'll probably pan out based on how he behaves, how he understands that the girl is disappointed when he caves in her to demands, etc.
Yay for November, a new month for new goals and great progress!  **Saturday Goals**  * [x] Morning Yoga * [x] 5,000 steps * [x] Grocery Shopping * [] Get coffee at new cafe * [] Work on assignments * [x] Healthy eating * [x] Review October goals and create November ones * [x] Create Study plan * [x] Reading, vitamins, drink water, floss!  Hope you all have a brilliant day and achieve great things! :)
I wonder why it has gotten so bad under Obama?
Eff everything that isn't Biggs, Wedge or Terra in a magitek armor. I'd be dressed up as Wedge on day 1, and cruise the world from day 2 onward 
Make sure you have sufficient for your needs.
I don't know about my weight. But I am definitely in better shape than I was in high school. I was pregnant practically all of my 20s. I only feel like I've had control of my body the last couple of years. Almost 40 now. 
It's a restricted segment of the harddrive that contains the files necessary to restore the computer back to factory conditions. If it has one you can do the restore, then try the update again.  What kind of computer is it? Did it come with Windows 8 initially? That'll dictate how to start the recovery.
Is it bundled ?
Is it post-it notes?
&gt; I should also point out that in their biased reporting, all of these media outlets completely ignored the fact I also mod (and created) the subreddit /r/TheRedPillCirclejerk, a community dedicated to making fun of the genuinely misogynistic /r/TheRedPill. They also ignored the fact another subreddit I regularly participate in is /r/PurplePillDebate, where I regularly make arguments against red pill philosophy (not exactly difficult when it’s basically bastardised evopsych backed up by fake internet anecdotes).  This is the only paragraph you should have written.
As long as the FO is willing to match a max offer in the offseason, I love the move. The cap is about to go up considerably over the next few years, and I don't think we're going to have any issues keeping our core guys together this time around.
Caramel cheesecake please! Thanks!!
Because they are delicious and can easily be paired with different foods and seasons of the year.
This post has been automatically removed because you do not appear to have included a design brief, or because you didn't use a Google.doc.  As per the subreddit rules, every request post must include a design brief in a Google.doc. There are design brief template links in the sidebar.  Please read the sidebar, create a design brief, and retry your submission with a link to your design brief.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Ffreedesign) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Hollow point bullets to the wings. They have no damage threshold. 
I'll drink an extra boilermaker in your honor. Cheers. 
If anyone knows why the sides have been cut off, please help me fix it, I don't know why because I rendered at the same width I recorded at (1280), so it should be fine.
mad feels.   mad feels.
My favorite is she had her notebook labeled "Erotic Friend Fiction"!
Pacesetters is always a pretty good place. They have a good selection of all ski/snowboard related gear, id recommend them! 
I had wanted to buy one of Ubi Workshop's hoodies and the phantom blade for a party I'm going to, but then bills happened.
Hopefully EG is the first one to get his ass sued.
jowns7 28 hunter, good weapons and armor, experienced and have mic
Must feed offspring. Then I post.
Whoa lol
It's a pillow so if I get sleepy... I can just lay down. Ha 
Thats my opinion of it too. But I cant help but have this feeling that Valve is going to pull something for TI5 that will make people want to buy up the compendium just as badly.
I liked Detox's look.
Even my errors aim to please.
Umm... Yea.
That hit looked bad.
Universe-timbersaw Iceiceice-Tidehunter   Wut.
oh, its fapp,not app
Shuck it, Trebek!
I'd love to make you purr
We need a game dev or programmer to make a game called victim combat.
Congratulations to /u/CrystalLord, /u/kjhatch and /u/Mon2880.
Keep it up bro. The more you do this shit, the more girls will flock to guys like me, who can actually exchange a few sentences before getting down to the sex. Edit: apparently trollX doesn't like sentences.  
Except the Mithril Sword from Beatrix in Burmecia...cause the odds are so far against you, and you only have 10 minutes, and they're very common after that battle.
same that was a legendary show man! wish i was there soooo bad 
I hate Meelo more.
Yes, you would be out of line to take on a work situation on her behalf.   Be supportive, be sympathetic, encourage her to take action, but DO NOT fly in like an avenging angel and make your girlfriend look like a kid whose parent storms into the principal's office.
Not funny independently of your comment. Now hilarious. Going to caption it and FB it. Have an upvote!
City **is** a pretty big team. For the *Premier League*.
In other words you just want Karma you did not earn
*Roger walks around in a pirate outfit with Kain the iguana parrot on his shoulder. He seems gleeful for this event.*
*ground shakes*
That's a shoppe. I can tell by the pixels.
I am joining you. Cheers. 
Is... Is that a strand of domestic 240v cable?
Okay, would say good luck, but I see you already have a deal anyway :)
Just family, actually!
Hey Gendgi! please save sending your files in to us until I have approve your submission and Atronos contacts you. The process goes like this...  + You create your item and put it up for review. + Mods look it over and either give feedback or approve it + Once your submission is mod approved that means I need to look at it for final approval + At this point I will look it over and either provide feedback and set it back to active where the process starts over again or I accept it. + If accepted, atronos contacts you asking for your files and he will add them to the game.
I'm all about feminism, but we also need to be able to laugh about things too.  I NEVER said my husband was going to rape me.  Sounds like you're the one with something up your ass!
Crap this isn't good. Hope this is minor
Yeah I see what you mean. I guess that I said surprisingly just because of the fact that he seems so skinny on the court. He's only 19, and I guess I just wouldn't expect him to be as shredded as he is. You're right though, he's an athletic freak!
both 720p and 1080p should work, and fullscreen shouldn't change anything
That was actually a good impersonation too lol.. had the mannerisms down and everything
TL.DR: Big wall of text that I'm really not capable of shortening :P read at own will.  I could start off with some comments on the list: - The overlord is OK, you really should get him a Warscythe as it really is one of the better melee weapons in the game. For an Overlord that's probably going in an infantry unit the rest of the kit is good (see below for the more popular build for the overlord recently).  - The Troops are good, I personally love Tesla Immortals, but you should consider Gauss if you are expecitng tanks.  - 2 Barges, perfect, just about the best unit we have in our codex right now. - As for the rest of your points, you are at 845 now, get the warscythe on your lord and then for the rest of the points up to 1k I would get rid of the ress orb, give the overlord a phase shifter and a command barge. The Overlord in catacomb command barge is one of the most popular things for Necrons since 7th came, because it is a beast! fly it over anything and crush them with sweeping attacks, he can take down multiple vehicles himself over the course of a game this way. Phase Shifter and MSS makes him really hard to kill also. The last points i would put into a cryptek, either a harbinger of storm or destruction would be good here.  As for other general Necron tips (won't comment the same units again here): Ignore the named characters, the generic overlord and destroyer lord do the same jobs better and cheaper. The Destroyer lord is awesome, specially together with wraiths (re-roll those ones). Most crypteks are great, they are cheap and provide lots of utility (Destruction for MC's, Storm for vehicles, Despair for deathmark cheese). Lords are ok, but a bit expensive, but at higher points they are better than overlords at giving ress orbs and warscythes to units.  C'tan shards are to expensive and fragile, Deathmarks are a solid unit, Flayed ones is our worst unit in the codex, Lychguard and Praetorians are way too expensive. Scarabs are great, even better with some Spyders. Wraiths are one of our best units. Tomb Blades and Destroyers are expensive with bad guns. Doom scythe is OK, but a bit expensive and you are much better off with Night scythes (which are awesome!). Doomsday ark will blow up way too fast. And the Monolith is expensive with not much value. 
I don't plan on being outdoors too much except to see the Aurora if it's out and maybe witness alien land scapes.  I'll have some ok winter clothing 
It can't be Susan, Missy even called him her "Boyfriend" during her first appearance, and it's well known that Susan is his granddaughter.
You can't? 
Okay I can't tell who you're agreeing with.   One thing though, I (kinda) would classify the R8 as a supercar. I mean if I had to chose the R8 between other supercars, it would not win that choice. I guess that's what you said. It's a supercar compared to the RS5 or something, but comparing it to a Bugatti is just silly.   I know this doesn't really help my case, but with the R8 it's more of the fact that it looks like a work of art. 
Rofl... the ones bit that really matters is completely ignored (income parity).  Oh yea, and "Professional and Technical Workers"... significantly more females than males according to that chart!  But it is reported as being 1.0 (perfect equality).  How the fuck is that correct? Just look at it this way... according to that survey, women could make 3x as much than men and it would be a perfect rank #1 for equality in that corner.  If women make less, it's inequality... if women make more, it's the most equal thing ever!
Wow Sutter took a time out. That's rare. 
Do you only treadmill? Because that will lose you muscle over fat if you're routinely jogging away on the treadmill without doing HIT training or something.
* Probably heard of: [This Will Destroy You](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=YdqT3MDAG2w) (Post-rock progressive)  * Might have heard of: [Broken Bells](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SnmzqnJtNb4) (Alternative Rock, but very unique)  * Probably never heard of: [Phantogram](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZvSgLHWR16o) (Electronic rock? Hard to describe)  * Never heard of: [Tom Day](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QhDv9Gwj5wI) (Progressive ambient electronic)  -------------------------------------------------------------  **Bonus Edit:**   *Probably:* [Postal Service](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AFHkfnyAstg) (Alternative)   *Definitely Not:* [Jose Gonzalez](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ruQQ5UvICvA) (Acoustic) (Full disclosure: this is the greatest acoustic song of all time.)
&gt; Do you believe in necromancy? From a young girls heart? 
Allow me to try and illustrate. My brother-in-laws' parents died when he was 6 in a car accident. After being shuffled around a couple of foster himes, he was eventually placed into an catholic-run orphanage, and was sexually abused repeatedly by a number of the catholic staff (almost entirely priests). Over the next 9 years he was relocated to a number of different facilities all over the country - and received sexual abuse at all but one. He is now a witness in the [Australian equivalent of a Supreme Court Inquiry](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Royal_Commission_into_Institutional_Responses_to_Child_Sexual_Abuse) into institutionalised sexual abuse in church operated organisations.  However, does his experience trump yours? He can quite correctly state that *in his experience* that majority of catholics he has ever known were active child molesters. Does that make it true? Experience only assists in giving us a framework from which to judge the validity of new information - dismissing *new* information based on *previous experience only* is a dangerous practice. You *assume* he's talking out of his ass - based SOLELY on the fact that you disagree, nothing more. He even provided a citation for his assertion - the statement from the Catholic church themselves, whereas you have merely provided one person's interpretation of your personal and unique experience.  [EDIT: typo]
not really no
I have mixed feelings about gamersgate, but I think that's a cop out. good writers can write well about anyone, regardless of their gender. and anyway, I would argue that it's easier for a male writer to write about a female human than a male non-human if they are looking to use their own experiences (in some way) for the character.
Beautiful eyes and smile 
Some kind of south american cichlids, for sure. They don't mess around.
/r/shinypokemon
This happened with Brady/Moss in 07.  Dunno who got it though.
We know
It's music from durarara, no idea what's the name though.  EDIT: Kokoro wo Shibaru Ai no Kotoba is the name.
I think they might be keeping track of common sites visited from a certain page. Enough people google "Tragedy of the Commons" immediately from that page, so it suggests it. Just my thought.
[Dryad Arbor](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Handlers/Image.ashx?name=Dryad%20Arbor&amp;type=card&amp;.jpg) - [Gatherer](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Dryad%20Arbor), [MagicCards](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Dryad%20Arbor), [Prices ($)](http://www.mtgprice.com/search?search=Dryad%20Arbor)   ^^^[[cardname]] ^^^to ^^^call ^^^- ^^^not ^^^on ^^^gatherer ^^^= ^^^not ^^^fetchable
Any guy who has been in the military can probably do it in 3. 
But Ray Allen isn't on the team yet Jalen.
Psh as if it wasn't already there :P
(•_•)  ( •_•)&gt;⌐■-■  (⌐■_■)
Hehe, yay! Never mind then :)
TCAS doesn't work as amazing as you might think, but if both helo had it, it's possible it could have been prevented. The problem with this is that TCAS was not as advanced back then as it is now. TCAS now most certainly could have prevented this accident from occuring, and would have gave warnings at least 500 feet away if not more. The real issue is that these pilots are tasked with so much, that even with a 500 feet warning, he could have not had enough time to properly adjust, depending on how fast he was moving forward. Also, it looks like they're in a city, which can kind of mess with TCAS if it has tall buildings. There are other systems that run off IFF that can protect planes/helo from crashing into each other, but it's very regulated by the FAA. 
Siri supports rewinding in certain media apps, like Podcasts, but not others.
I thought that was a faint?  EDIT: Thought about it, realised why it was stupid. Bet there's some big plan for courier 2 coming up...
Probably (definitely) heard of- Silverstein Might have heard of- The Acacia Strain Might not have heard of- The Number Twelve Looks Like You Haven't heard of- Bermuda
Being a mama is hard work. You deserve a break. I hope it works out. Good luck!
I wouldn't trust unsourced information like that coming from someone who has not included a volume. 
on this note, document EVERYTHING.   How many attempts bell made, conversations between your landlord and you
I don't know how things are in your subject/grade/state but I teach high school English and honestly I look at standards as the guideposts I have to hit as I get through stuff that I want to focus on. Generally they are things like explore themes in texts which should be done pretty much any time I look at a book anyways. I may just be lucky but honestly most of my standards are just common sense so we barely talk about them unless test data shows we're struggling with something.
Armin doesn't get enough love around here. He is by far my favorite character!
Does anyone know what page this was pulled from? I wondered if it was a list of advertisers or something. That being said, there are no ads on any of the Gawker sites for me in the US.
the exe for FFXIII is located on : SteamApps&gt;commom&gt;Final Fantasy XIII&gt;white_data&gt;prog&gt;win&gt;bin&gt;ffxiiiimg.exe
I made the mistake of forward settling them (are below the capital had some sweet city spots) and not filling every available tile with a unit.  They came in such force I rarely see from an AI.  It was my mistake for sure, especially because the city they took was the one I was using to pump out units.
lol
Bigger.
Heck yes. But it doesn't stop....
The "joyful fat" Buddha is actually not Gautama Buddha (the original Buddha and the founder of Buddhism), but rather, is an entirely different man - Budai. Budai is a Chinese folkloric figure who came to be identified with Maitreya. Maitreya is not a historical individual, but rather, is an incarnation of Buddha who is prophesied to appear on Earth sometime in the future.  I don't know enough about East Asian Buddhism to really answer why or when Budai became identified with Maitreya, but I think it is worth noting that the "fat Buddha" is not the same person as the calm, relaxed Gautama Buddha. Budai is popular in Japan (where he is known as Hotei) as well as in China, yet there are quite a few statues of Gautama Buddha in Japan as well.
This video is Age Restricted, **[here's a direct link](http://www.youtube.com/v/e7JcuINGdBc)** if you'd rather not login.
Some responses to his tweet.   https://www.facebook.com/TheSeahawks12thMan/posts/612555962182246  http://bleacherreport.com/articles/2251942-golden-tate-takes-shot-at-former-seahawks-teammates-about-halloween-costume
Well, simply knowing it's magic would allow a save I would think.
You realize I just meant that I used rsync to move my Debian EXT4 FS to a BTRFS FS.  For backups I am just using "btrfs subvolume snapshot" and then btrfs send/receive to send some snapshots to another disk.  When I need to restore from a broken config/state I can just do that by reverting a snapshot on the OS disk itself.  I only need to use the snapshots on the other disk if my OS disk should itself fail completely.  My Debian OS is about 10GB and I take nightly snapshots and keep them for a month.  What is essentially 10 full snapshot copies of my OS only takes 25GB including my OS, so about 15GB for 30 snapshots.  Pretty nice as a traditional backup would take 300GB for 30 copies of 10GB.  About 500GB of changed data a day which I suspect is logs and other more volatile data but It's low enough that I haven't bothered to try to reduce it.
How much is a regular black coffee?
WHOA. That is way way better!
The way my vet explained it to me is the rabbit's blood pressure drops dangerously low while in this state and when they "wake" their blood pressure skyrockets and allows them a sudden burst of adrenaline that would aid in a hasty escape. This explosion of blood pressure could cause a heart attack which can kill your rabbit. For a perfectly healthy rabbit it's just scary. But unless you know how your buns heart is it can be dangerous.  Though I do know many have done it without problems, I also have a friend who's bunny died that way due to a heart defect they didn't know about. (when I put my bun on his back for nails or scent gland I prop his head up)
You tried to tip someone 20 bucks? For someone basically taking your money away to begin with? What the hell is wrong with people?
I know it was spooky but I was xtra spooked.
Omg I love umphreys saw them live so many times only good part about growing up in Indiana. 
Yes, you can generally come back and recruit during the fall of your second year. Usually, the signing bonus reduces the longer you wait. 
No, no no. We don't call that perjury, it's collateral languaging.
That sounded profound enough for Dumbledore
Any peripherals? Windows? OC y/n? Also try /r/buildapcforme
Glad it was as purposeful as it looked
please appreciate if you add me its will mean a lot PLZ
Its not available for me (i don't live in the united states) I want to use the native phone number of my sim-card, if its possible :)
You don't need to inform anyone of an obvious fake.
December x-mas for sure, if not diretide 2.0
*meanwhile in a parallel universe*...
ADC: Trist  
Not just its visuals , it really isnt functioning properly . 
I love the "limp kitten" feeling of exhaustion after prolonged high alert.  Not having the other shoe drop is absolutely maddenning. I've destroyed other relationships over this.
Hell yeah, Paul's Boutique!
I'll be sitting on my porch giving kids travel-sized toothpaste and unpopped bags of popcorn while watching the game. It's gonna be great. Go Preds. 
Or his grandaughter is in the bathroom.
I offer 1 key for The Walking Dead: 400 Days
Not much lighter- the second-to-last (3rd) stage had a dry mass (overhead) of 290kg, while the final stage (4th) had a mass at ignition of 111kg - a smaller payload would not have made it possible to use a significantly smaller first, second, or third stage.  So for the question in the title, I'm going to guess about 60kg lighter.
You're right, I think they're obviously trying to make him look like a paunchy old alcoholic.  
I don't know man, I trust Jim Carrey. He postponed making the movie for SO long because he was never happy with the script, and they worked it, and reworked it for so long.  I'm optimistic about it, Dumb and Dumber is such a classic, but i'm sure if I saw the trailer for it without seeing it, I think I would think it looked *dumb* too.
The Stranger used to cover Alabama expat pastor Hutchinson's anti-gay trolling.  But then he died.  So they needed a new distraction and Mark Driscoll volunteered for the job. 
Sorry pal, but New Atheism is a religion if I've ever seen one, and Sam Harris is its pope. 
CM Punk?
I feel like GG lost its legitimacy as a movement against journalistic corruption when they went after the feminists.  Zoe Quinn was not a journalist.  Anita Sarkeesian was not a journalist.  Even if a lot of people in GG strongly disagree with Sarkeesian or Quinn, it should never have been a part of their movement.  They should have gone after the journalist that allegedly had sex for a good review and determined if it was a true allegation or not, then proceed accordingly.  Edit: used the wrong word
I see your point, but Los Angeles and San Diego are not deserts, despite the misinformation. Much of southern california is largely considered to be in the California coastal mediterranean/shrubland biome (sources have different terms for its technical name). Not that it isn't subject the the threat of desertification, its just not correct to say that we live in a manufactured paradise that would otherwise be desert. We would not have palm trees or bird of paradise flowers, but desert is not what you'd get if everyone just suddenly left.   Of course, if your talking about places like Barstow, east past the San Bernardino mtns, those are certainly desert, but are also nothing like L.A (which has several microclimates within itself even) or the coastal cities whatsoever where the average temperature is 75 degrees (f). 
80s Magic  90s Jordan (Stockton a close 2nd and an honorable mention to The Admiral.)  00s The correct answer for me would be Timmy D. My heart however says MANNNNUUUUU!!!!!  10s Tony Parker  All time... Manu. The man plays with such ferocity and passion. Basketball wasn't my main sport but when I was playing football or racing motocross, Manu was my inspiration. To charge it every play/lap with everything I had. 
o
I'm from the Midwest, just got here for school. I missed rain so much. 
How does a secret meeting scare congress? And how are they 'secret' if the public knows about them?
I'm not gay, but I know how it feels to have someone not love you back. It really hurts, leaves pain in your heart.  But don't let that stop you, I'm sure your a beautiful person who has so much to give.  It may take a while to find someone to love you back, but I can assure you, you will.  Happy Halloween!
I actually really like kessel separated from Bozie and jvr. He's getting kadri and lupul/winnik going and jvr and bozak are playing well regardless. 
Sorry if this is a stupid question, but what tweak is that? The one I used didn't have a search feature in the middle 
I'm not familiar enough with the bounty to know if there are certain modes/weapons you can and cannot use for it, but if it's open...try playing Clash.  Autorifle, shotgun, rocket launcher.
Yeah, give or take.
hurrah for RPPVP servers... got minifernal, scourged whelpling, tiny twister, and a bunch of other hard to get pets by doing that.
Wowww what the hell NBC. A to Z is one of my favorite new TV shows and I've never been hooked on a new show so fast and yet they freaking ax it. This is bull. Just because a show doesn't do well on it's first season, doesn't mean you don't give it a chance.
I'm very happy I went with it. That said, I knew what I was getting, and had the money to burn on both the DK2, and a proper PC build to run it. I enjoy problem solving, which helps with figuring out how to get things running sometimes, and I've also been waiting over 20 years for a good VR experience. 
I'm more interested in the EggMoves more than anything. Do you have any HA or EM pokes? 
Is this a serious question? I mean...you can't imagine any scenarios where people with fucked up ideas about women still have relationships with them?
Kpando. 28 titan
**[WHY WHY WHY WHY](https://imgur.com/gallery/GFzapvZ)**
makes sense. so the administrators of Reddit are trying to follow the same trend as them?
I can barely get past the first set of water jumps. &gt;.&lt;
Agree with it or not, piracy is going to happen. Publishers responding in ways that harm the consumer is still on the heads of the publishers. They should know better.
Will it kill you? No. Just listen to your body and, especially at your age, be delegent to form. You can both get away with crappy lifting technique at that age but can also dial in exceptional movement, which will serve you better than raw volume at that (or any) level. Get perfect, then add volume. When you and your coach agree your form is dialed down, then make a plan for your body type and goals.
"looks at title"  "facepalms"  You **COULD** say it was fake at least.
&gt; People don't often know that people are Roma when they're going about their business doing normal stuff.   Have you even seen a Roma in real life? They're darker skinned and they have quite distinct facial features, they're definitely noticeable if the rest of the country is mostly white. I mean I don't know maybe they're lighter skinned elsewhere but they're definitely noticeable here in Croatia.
Is the scanner in the drive app itself or is an add on?
Made an account just to share this pic of my dog when she was a puppy...seriously twins!  http://imgur.com/5dEuc2E   and older  http://imgur.com/x5L9tqg
yeah they got lucky 2 years in a row and somehow made it into the final. talk about beating the odds
Just absolutely shameful. Check out this show who just talked about gun control today: http://theliveshow.tv/the-live-show/should-the-gov-outlaw-guns-voter-fraud-caught-on-tape-rep-greyson/
&gt;spongescream -2 points 5 hours ago I've seen guy without legs compete in a marathon.   Your are not your son.  I have… seen foreskins you people wouldn't believe… Giant pink flesh-girdles on penises off the crotch of Orion. I watched dongs-socks glimmer in the dark near the Tannhäuser Gate. All those… moments… will be lost in time, like *small cough* tears… in… rain. Time… to circumsize…
I'll put it this way: I didn't believe in this team. I do believe in this team. This whole playoff run was playing with house money. I'm choosing to look at the optimistic side of this.
In Texas we have a police officer on every campus. Ours once pepper sprayed herself in the face when a baseball player refused a **school** drug test. Then tried to sue him for assault on a police officer. Yea, school cops are dumb.
Awesome. Reminds me of all those Halo grenade pile Warthog flips.
Have you checked the rear windows?
Your location would help. Shipping would be your biggest cost.  But you would be mixing the 'quality' of the overall print by having many printers do the job.
In [CINERAMA](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Du7ls7v2uYQ).
has the choice between the front or back and chooses the back?  Latent homosexual.   
That made me smile. BIG smile. /applause
Congrats on your current weight loss! 18 pounds is totally doable in 100 days! Glad you'll be with us staying on track throughout the holidays. I plan on posting starting pics this week too.
holy shit i thought you were just fucking with me
Does your wife have a fedora? 
It's people like you, that make this game fun! Keep it up! :D
Thank you! Good luck!
28 Warlock- never done raid, but have mic and ready to give it a go: GansInJapan
The daily heroic missions should be do-able solo as they are just more difficult versions of the story missions, you don't absolutely need a full fireteam.
http://imgur.com/oGYXojL
Call of Doodie
NG+++
Yes, I would. 
Yeah, I watched it. Still think you should see your doctor about it. Obviously it's not normal. Not an urgent issue as long as you can eat, etc
Holy shit those 12 points and rising a few.. Some plebs can only dream down below in the comment tree...
You poor poor man.  
It seems really sad that that wouldn't be a familiar phrase to anyone.
ok so why do they not just move them into some heavily guarded place and if they cant move them, just guard them there, why leave them unattented?
AHHHhHhHhHhHHHHHHHGG!!!!!
There are plenty of mods to reduce/remove crashing. Even without any of these mods installed, I find I crash maybe once every 6-7 hours. I've never had a saved game go corrupt on me. This is quite possibly my favourite game of all time, and in my opinion, it completely worth it.  Source: 182 hours on record.
Alright, makes sense. So the SpaxeX rocket the also exploded earlier this week without any reported casualties was unmanned?
What can I say, I like a variety of music! 
The Smiths - Meat is Murder
no, I can't. It says "folders and OneNote notebooks cannot be downloaded"
So what's your idea of a "good scary movie"?
"Ppprrrieu?" 
I swear people in this sub call everyone that plays good defense and has an ounce of a jumper a "3 and D guy" 
fuck all these halloween spooks my dog is super spooked gotta unsub
? What do you mean? 
"Here's the outcome I see for myself: Best case scenario, I will end up living in a small rented room working at McDonalds and doing a poor job of it until my death."  I think the same... i'm like you in fact. I can't really say something to make you better, but man i know your feel and i'm facing the same problems.  
I bet we see better play out of everyone tonight. By the way, Delly had the best differential last night, so that was nice to see. 
I have a similar experience from Scotland. They get a hard time often there but we love them mostly. The youngsters are the racist ones.
I would say compared to the rest of the world, most definitely yes :)
You went to the gym for 10 years to lose weight?   How lazy/much of a pig are you?   Anyone can lose 80-100lbs in a year if they fucking tried. 
Are there any plans to have worldwide events such as allstars in AU/NZ in the future despite AU/NZ to have pretty bad infrastucture in terms of internet?
he's talking about karma karma not karma the player
Same.
Just before the start of the 100m sprint, every athlete has to spin until they fall down
No point in traveling over to take Europe's minimal prize pools anyways lol   &amp; you're all free to come over here to Flopmerica if you're so confident, but why is it that Armada and Leffen are the only Europeans who can consistently place well here?
Speed limits are time travel restrictions. Whoa.
Today was a good day
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4NsQLq7EMkk
Well we do have Kotaku in Action to discuss it thoroughly so it's not like it really stops us from discussing it. The worst part is that it stops the people who were never interested in it before and heard about GG through colbert's show and whatnot.
I ended up,doing frylock http://i.imgur.com/g7jKgiL.jpg
*cringing intenzinfies*
Not true for me anyways. Mine doesn't show but I was able to buy the response stuff. 
Definite upvotes for saying costume instead of needlessly calling it a cosplay.
Predicted only 1 team from that division will make the playoffs. Considering changing what team that is though.
u can lvl 1 hero and activate farmmode, it will swap auto. to the last lvl i dont know why but i only have this feature on google chrome, on firefox is nothing there  and to get gold from the highest zone, i m lvling my masked samurai a few times and swap to the last zone, i cant kill the mob there but if i  safe the game and refresh the game, i gain some gold even tough i cant kill the mobs maybe its a bug or something, but it helps alot to gain gold for the first hero lvls
Dude I think your best bet would be to find a sketchy pharmacy and try to see if they will sell you an oxy script without a script. That is probably your best bet. I wouldn't go alone cause you don't want to get kidnapped by ISIS homie.
Rego Park, NYC - 1070
ahh shiet. well good luck !
And those rich people have agents who scour the web for them.  Redfin, realtor.com, zillow and a myriad of other sites will get your buyer if you price it accordingly.
That's a big fucking lie and you know it. The pictures from my fucking iPhone 4 smashes my Note 3 to the ground and beats it to death.
There's always NPR, which seems to me the hands down least biased news source available in the US. Unless you talk to a conservative, in which case they are the most liberally biased (but this is just because facts have a well known liberal bias).
It's not like anyone HAS to wear them...
Awww yisss!
Welcome aboard. Feel free to head to ouyaforum.com, its got a really friendly community of devs and buyers, and discussions on games so you know how good games are and what to expect before you buy.
I think it's an either/or thing.  Fun times hotel!  But not too much fun times.
I love you.
Singapore is very easy to travel around. Just use the MRT to get around and you will be fine.  A few things:  1. Singapore has the world's best zoo. Make sure to checkout the Zoo/Night Safari while you're there.  2. 2 weeks is a long time in Singapore. I felt that I could see all of it in a few days. Don't be afraid to head over the border to Malaysia if you want to see more: Malaysia is cheaper so you get more bang for your buck and is also pretty easy to travel.  3. Food is a big reason to travel to Singapore. Make sure you try at least one dish from each of the three ethnic groups: Chinese, Malay, and Indian. Just head into a hawker centre and look around, it's a great experience.
That only works in a room of morons.. 
never thought i say this but the us pricing is a joke in comparison to the eu pricing. And i thought that that is way too high compaired to what you get. In the US i wouldnt have the hobby ^^
All of these teams are tied with another for 3-5 in our 8 team league, one game out from the 4th and final seed:  Team1 | Team2 | Team3 ---------|----------|---------- **QB** Cam Newton| **QB** Colin Kaepernick | **QB** Tom Brady **RB** DeMarco Murray | **RB** Arian Foster | **RB** Justin Forsett **RB** Lamar Miller | **RB** Andre Ellington | **RB** Shane Vereen **WR** Michael Crabtree | **WR** Pierre Garcon | **WR** DeSean Jackson **WR** Dez Bryant | **WR** Anquan Boldin | **WR** Sammy Watkins **WR** Andre Johnson | **WR** Michael Floyd | **WR** Julian Edelman **TE** Vernon Davis | **TE** Antonio Gates | **TE** Rob Gronkowski **QB/RB/WR/TE** Eli Manning | **QB/RB/WR/TE** Andy Dalton | **QB/RB/WR/TE** Joe Flacco **RB/WR/TE** Toby Gerhart | **RB/WR/TE** Andrew Hawkins | **RB/WR/TE** Jason Witten **K** Nick Novak | **K** Cody Parkey | **K** Justin Tucker **DEF** Philly | **DEF** Cleveland | **DEF** New England **BENCH** RG3 | **BENCH** Tim Tebow | **BENCH** Danny Ammendola **BENCH** Joique Bell | **BENCH** Doug Martin | **BENCH** Chris Ivory **BENCH** Juilo Jones | **BENCH** Frank Gore | **BENCH** Ben Roethlisberger **BENCH** Martellus Bennett | **BENCH** Andre Holmes | **BENCH** LeGarrette Blount **BENCH** Zach Ertz | **BENCH** Jordan Cameron | **BENCH** Steve Hauschka **BENCH** Houston DEF | **BENCH** Marques Colston | **BENCH** Carolina DEF   Do take a shot and guess how they are, tiebreaker-wise. Yes, I realize these guys aren't in the playoffs yet, but there's a good chance on of them makes it in.
Gia'.
I agree, it is a fantastic game, I never played any of the insomniac games because I never got interested in any playstation console but damn this is a great game
Palace might be the most beautiful song I've ever heard. 
Probability low.
&gt;girl that song is 2012 we're on 1989 now which is 2014. catch up  ... You lost me. 
Had no idea how useful this would be when I first saw it
This should be enough justification for Ukraine to kill all Russian Press inside it's country. I wouldn't trust them after seeing this clip.
Would love to see video of this.
Bear in mind that if the roof drains plug up with leaves or other debris, and/or they are not adequate for the rare torrential rain in your area, water can build up on the roof until there is enough weight to collapse the roof. You want multiple scuppers to minimize that risk.
Congratulations guys! You have been doing an awesome job for the network, and I'm sure you will continue to do so!
Any time dude. Chief on!
The fact you have to mention another sneaker just shows how great these aren't...
I knew it would be Laughing in the Dark. I wasn't expecting the double features though.
It just became another drug of choice for me.  That's why I hated it. I've been clean for 2 years, and if I relapsed, it would 100% be on subs.  Was my favorite opiate from the first time I tried it.
he's not even the steve nash of canada. 
True.  And Russia these days is not in a mood to sulk or be an uncooperative pariah.  It is eager to trade with the world, engage the world, and join in the struggle to defeat the unipolar disease and create a world order that respects human diversity..
It's lame, dated and goofy... but I don't hate it. 
10
My heart jumped a bit at the mention of chipirones in London!  Do you think I could find octopus in Billingsgate, by any chance? I've been after it since I moved here from Spain.
HYPE!
Oh really? Sorry I sound ignorant because I have never been outside the country. DO you know why that is?
ok, thanks!
He took down LTG in Ultra, now he is bulking up to fuck him up physically and shut him up for good.
very tight fitting
If anyone from that earlier thread was wondering, I just signed up yesterday for ballstreams, and I'm streaming right now and it's beautiful. Obviously it's only the first week, but if this is how it's going to be all season, I'm very impressed
#####&amp;#009;  ######&amp;#009;  ####&amp;#009;  [**Thriller (song)**](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thriller%20%28song%29): [](#sfw)   ---  &gt;"__Thriller__" is a song recorded by American recording artist [Michael Jackson](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Michael_Jackson), composed by [Rod Temperton](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Rod_Temperton), and produced by [Quincy Jones](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Quincy_Jones). It is the seventh and final single from his sixth studio album [of the same name](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thriller_(Michael_Jackson_album\)). It was released on November 12, 1983 in most countries and January 23, 1984 in the United States by [Epic Records](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Epic_Records). The song has appeared on multiple greatest hits compilation albums from Jackson, including *[HIStory](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/HIStory:_Past,_Present_and_Future,_Book_I)* (1995), *[Number Ones](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Number_Ones_(Michael_Jackson_album\))* (2003), *[The Essential Michael Jackson](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Essential_Michael_Jackson)* (2005), and *[Michael Jackson's This Is It](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/This_Is_It_(Michael_Jackson_album\))* (2009) and it was remixed to the *[Immortal](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Immortal_(Michael_Jackson_album\))* album in 2011. The song, which has a voice-over from actor [Vincent Price](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vincent_Price) had originally been titled "Starlight".  &gt;====  &gt;[**Image**](https://i.imgur.com/Kal9CtZ.jpg) [^(i)](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:Michael_jackson_thriller_12_inch_single_USA.jpg)  ---  ^Interesting: [^Michael ^Jackson's ^Thriller](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Michael_Jackson%27s_Thriller) ^| [^The ^Fat ^of ^the ^Land](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Fat_of_the_Land) ^| [^Beat ^It](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Beat_It) ^| [^Thriller ^\(Michael ^Jackson ^album)](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Thriller_\(Michael_Jackson_album\))   ^Parent ^commenter ^can [^toggle ^NSFW](/message/compose?to=autowikibot&amp;subject=AutoWikibot NSFW toggle&amp;message=%2Btoggle-nsfw+clpmhxe) ^or[](#or) [^delete](/message/compose?to=autowikibot&amp;subject=AutoWikibot Deletion&amp;message=%2Bdelete+clpmhxe)^. ^Will ^also ^delete ^on ^comment ^score ^of ^-1 ^or ^less. ^| [^(FAQs)](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/autowikibot/wiki/index) ^| [^Mods](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/autowikibot/comments/1x013o/for_moderators_switches_commands_and_css/) ^| [^Magic ^Words](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/autowikibot/comments/1ux484/ask_wikibot/)
just sitting here...being quiet...waiting patiently unlike others...
Both men and women are given special privileges and are still being discriminated against one way or another. I think his friend was making the argument that feminism isn’t the only egalitarian group, and that the feminist movement is no longer able to help the strive for equality. While I disagree with that point, it’s still valid. Feminism doesn’t own the concept of egalitarianism. Saying “feminists aren’t needed any more” doesn’t mean “we are now equal”.
Edit: I don't know how to tell jokes, shadowatcher will do a better job.
*Rildo attempts to blend into the road as he did earlier today*  [[1d20+5 blending]]/u/rollme
my guess is he wants 5% insurance vs 10% on launch....
Wow, I never knew about that. Thanks.
Sounds good to me.
Stupid Sexy Lewandowski
The video and all the comments that she's frustrated about are a bigger circle jerk than what's going on in 'best of' about her post...   I guess that's ok though. 
It's from [this site](http://overthecap.com/salary-cap/carolina-panthers/).  They're usually pretty accurate.  
PURCHASED
PUT YOUR GRASSES OWN  NOTHING WILL BE WOWN 
Crunch Addict is seriously my favorite thing ever.  Can't get enough of it.  It's amazing.  If you like fruit flavors, check out Babylon.  It's a pear/blueberry and it's heavenly both out of the mail and after steeping for about a week.
[Obligatory family photo](http://i.imgur.com/67qJtW4.jpg) 
so if you didn't eat anything or refused SOME foods you got tubed?
Google Music to access my 20,000-song custom library.  I'd say less than 10% of the songs are available on Pandora or iTunes.
LET'S GOOOO!!
I'm pretty sure they'll figure out a solution to this. ForGG should obviously be able to continue to compete in Europe, and I'm sure Blizzard and the guys in charge agree with this.
[Original Submission at /r/news](/r/news/comments/2kxphi/guy_sues_american_hustle_for_misquoting_him/)
Yeah that would be ridiculous. 
Sell, for sure.
You mean, in all the pills the company ever made?
[Evernote](https://evernote.com/) and [Skitch](https://evernote.com/skitch/?utm_source=interspire). I use them all the time at work. If you ever had to write work instructions and need to annotate a picture with an arrow or easily readable text, then there is no better App.
Well you could try maxing out comms while leveling your new imp toon. No one has a stat advantage over anyone else in leveling pvp because you can't get expertise stuff until 55. So, it shouldn't be as painful as maxing them out at 55 on your new toon.
umm.. ok.   [This is what I found]( http://www.nytimes.com/2003/05/06/international/worldspecial/06TORT.html)   And it sounds awful. 
This isn't hailing corporate, this is just a midly interesting find in a box of nerds.
I didn't miss his attitude
Looks like a boring view. Better view in South Auckland night club.
Do you have a pic of the truck behind? 
Mario Kart 64, if you have it.
Well, then I don't think I'm interested. Thanks, anyway.
This, but I got the Boost model for $60 recently when it was on sale at Best Buy. This model can be bootloader unlocked so you can easily root, flash ROMs, etc if thats you're thing.   This phone feels more like a flagship model (its getting Android 5.0) than a neglected low end phone, which is how most other cheap prepaid phones feel like.
"High HP: Power Surge"
God, doesn't that make you bitter? i'm so fucking bitter about this. Do you want to kill something? let's get drunk on Bartle's and James.
TSM DanDy confirmed.... one could dream right?
Not to be a Debbie downer, but my honest feelings on all of this is it's just lip service being thrown around in every direction. What I mean by that is, Scarra knows the community is sick of Link under performing and now he has admitted to being unmotivated (confirms all our suspicions). In turn, Link is giving CLG lip service about suddenly finding motivation.   Link has done this before, and with circumstances different this time around, I think this will only prolong his stay on CLG for a short while until he stops caring again. The difference is this time there is a full time coach to make a judgement call. You don't lose all motivation and suddenly get it back this many times, and it takes more then motivation, it takes drive and grinding levels of determination (something Link lacks enough of).   I think the plan is to keep Link. I think it's always been the plan. From the way Hotshot has spoken about it cryptically, I believe the tryouts were setup to scare Link into taking this seriously, but I hope it results in someone hungrier taking over. 
&gt;Ice weapons are the coolest  Heh.  Also Diablos is extremely exploitable with the Sonic+Flash Combo which is a good reason I've never had issues with him.
Not any of the ones where I've been aware of the exchange, but I do occasionally get females that suddenly become really warm and chatty when they find out I prefer fucking dudes.  One time, a girl I'd literally met the same evening asked me if I wanted to go shopping with her. What the fuck! It's not that I don't like spending money, I just don't like you!  From the category of "Things I wish I had fucking said". In reality I just stared blankly at her until she went away...
Is that really the case with wake up calls though?   I think it's just having to answer the phone.
I graduated 11 months ago.  I am 23.  I majored in Electrical Engineering.  I had several job offers prior to graduation.  I chose to start working 24 days after my graduation ceremony.  I currently work as a software developer in Texas.  I am salaried at $96k per year with a target 10% bonus, $2k health incentive, and 6.25% 401k matching.  Total of which comes out to about $114k.  Ignoring vacation and holidays, and assuming 8 hour workdays (which is fairly accurate), I make $53.33 an hour in base salary or about $63 counting the bonus, retirement savings, and HSA contributions.  Edit: Fudged numbers slightly (base salary and total are the same) to preserve company anonymity.
Why have you not presented yourself to master?
Cold Soul by Ejuice2Die4
This is great news. FC Edmonton had a decent season which at first glance you wouldn't assume it was worthy of a contract extension but looking at the long term this was definitely the right decision
How do I become the deadliest assistant ever?
The Seventh Seal- Bergman Cinema Paradiso- Tornatore Seven Samurai- Kurosawa  La Strada- Fellini Knife In The Water- Polanski   Some favorites, and not necessarily the "best"  Hope this helps :)
&gt;I go back to my example above. Would you not be upset if a vendor/rapper/homeless guy/etc came up to you every 10 minutes and asked for a favor, EVERYDAY?  The only problem with that example is that the video is trying to prove that ALL women ALL the time are under CONSTANT attack by men to the point where ALL women feel like they're about to be raped at any moment all the time every day. Not only are they in the densest population center in the country by more than double, a good portion of the video seems to be in some of the most impoverished areas of the city as well. And this sort of intrusive behavior is typically a class issue more than anything else.   I'd be willing to bet substantial money that if a camera followed the same woman on her normal daily walking routine for as long as it takes to accumulate 10 hours of footage that the number of "harrassments" would be much much much lower.
quick question ... where's Sae ?
Nice!
ISIS are evil damn commies that need a freedom bomb but nuts to that, OP, ISIS supporters are protected by freedom of speech just as any 'Murican citizen is. As long as they don't engage or fund terrorism then it's fair game. 
Like everyone else said, call your insurance company. They got your back on this.  I hope you don't feel guilty about the child's injuries. She definitely should not have been in your house, and it is her mother's fault for not supervising her, not your fault for leaving your door briefly unlocked. Good luck!
It's important to note, GMB doesn't want alex. Of course we don't know what happend betweek alex and his employer, but he might not have resigned on the best terms. Still, GMB PR team is very good, and they never miss an oppertunity to give fans what they want. It is very possible that they could lobby for the return of alex. I also don't want NIQ replaced, he has waaay to much talent. Even in the huge losing streaks he played very consistently w/ amazing cs leads.
Just trying out YouTube's awesome new 60 FPS support. Pretty cool! Yet another showcase for the glorious PC Master Race.
i know em all!
Thread removed.   Reason : Post limit reached.   |Previous thread's URL|   |:-|   |http://www.reddit.com/r/SteamGameSwap/comments/2ku4fe/h_alien_isolation_sniper_elite_3_cod_ghosts_etc_w/|   Post limit resets in **0 hour(s) 0 minute(s)**|     &gt;**I'm a bot working for /r/SteamGameSwap** &gt;___ &gt;[^[FAQ]](http://www.reddit.com/r/SteamGameSwap/wiki/rules_and_restrictions#wiki_24_hour_limit) [^[Changelog]](http://www.reddit.com/r/warheat1990/comments/1ldfsp/rsgspolice_changelog/) [^[ReportBug]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=warheat1990&amp;subject=rSGSpolice%20bugs%20report) [^[Suggestion]](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FSteamGameSwap&amp;subject=rSGSpolice%20Suggestion)
http://youtu.be/IwfKtF_Yuzc  My favorite version  
Totally. Thank you for being clear and succinct. I appreciate it. Some of the literature out there comes of as a bit foggy by trying to be grandiose with its language.
are you stupid? childfree movement is more prevalent in the West not because there is some agenda to "reduce" white population. it's because they are more educated. the women are more educated thus they do not mindlessly shit out kids. they want to focus on their carreer, they reject the traditional notion that women should just get married and get  knocked up and raise kids. etc. women users are the majority on /r/childfree for this exact reason. 
Exploiting* and yes it was always around, just more hidden
I agree, man. This and Me Inside are 2 of my favorites
"attacks against me" why do you guys need to word everything so fucking melodramatically?  Can't you just say "criticism", or are you really so committed to role playing every blog post as warfare?  Or are you just declaring everything an "attack" because you're embracing the "Victimhood lifestyle"?  Secondly, I'd have been with you had it not been for /r/breakfeminazis.  I don't mind some kink myself, but that sub seemed more like a threat.  If anti-GG mods had a forum full of fantasies about raping gamergaters into submission, I somehow doubt that you guys would congratulate them on their totally legitimate kink.
Thanks for this comment. I will seriously consider building. It's just that I keep seeing big sales on desktops and it seems like those prices are a lot cheaper than what I could build myself. I suspect it's one of those situations where the computer looks better on paper than in real life.  I was hoping to get a better sense of what brands are worth it and which are total junk.  
no, not literally, but until I actually learned how to spell it, I had about 42% shot of getting it right. Main ten ance  Or my new favorite,  Cong rat u lations
at best it can be like the stories told here [link](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=j1sdTzj9iac)  but most of the time its like this [link](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=12N16xiwwzw)
anyone who says no thank you is scum? what?
I am going to hunt you down and murder your family!
Carl Bilancione
For maximum heel heat, he throws the belt in the trash on the RAW after survivor series. It "retires" the US belt, and Rusev marches on.
Who am I again?
**[Original Submission by /u/soupyhands](http://www.reddit.com/r/ClimbingCircleJerk/comments/2ktkkp/im_not_injured_and_i_can_climb_just_fine_just/)** into /r/ClimbingCircleJerk  ---  # Subreddit Overview * A community for: **3 years** * # of subscribers: **1,348** * # of mods: **2** * Subscribers per mod: **674**  # Popular Posts Summary * Top domains: self.ClimbingCircleJerk **(76%)**, imgur.com **(10%)**, reddit.com **(2%)** * % NSFW: **0%** * Average Score: **11**  # Discussion Summary * Average Comment Length: **~12** words per comment * Flesch-Kincaid Reading Level: **1** * Comments per post: **~4**  # A sampling of top posts: * Top all time: [I will shove a grigri up my ass if this post gets 50 upgoats. (104 points by /u/BelayMeMaybe)](http://www.reddit.com/r/ClimbingCircleJerk/comments/1vmpce/i_will_shove_a_grigri_up_my_ass_if_this_post_gets/) * Top this month: [Should You Bail Flowchart (36 points by /u/CaptainShitshow)](http://www.reddit.com/r/ClimbingCircleJerk/comments/2j38u3/should_you_bail_flowchart/) * Top this week: [r/climbingcirclejerk shirt? (26 points by /u/IShouldBeClimbing)](http://www.reddit.com/r/ClimbingCircleJerk/comments/2kphl6/rclimbingcirclejerk_shirt/)  ## **[Subscribe at /r/ClimbingCircleJerk](/r/ClimbingCircleJerk)**   
http://xhamster.com/movies/2562688/quality_amateur_sex_tape_with_dreamy_gf.html?embed=view
"DELLADOVA"  I guess it's better than what he said earlier "Dellyvasova"
Honestly I don't even know what to do anymore. For the first time I'm finding it hard to stick with a decision NV is making. I don't care for a god squad I love the team they have now. 
sent a party inviite
[Nice](http://41.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_m7cw46Uv0W1r13tm3o1_1280.jpg)
[Original Submission at /r/conspiracy](/r/conspiracy/comments/2kxph8/tonight_on_aljazeera_the_day_israel_attacked/)
There'll be the usual throws and overextentions with the odd brilliant performance as ever.
Well, I've long meant to do a semi-canonical write up of the basic premise (the rules are all somewhat pliable) but I run no less than a half dozen active projects in parallel at a time.  The closest to progress shots I have are the occasional ones I put on Instagram (inasmuch as some sketches become full blown submissions or paintings go through several stages of development before reaching final)  But one aspect that plays out here is for any canvas where I can slap it onto a scanner, I will often pick 'slabs' of a work, and sample it (i'll sometimes use a handcam, but its never as good as scanning at 600DPI) as Im working.  I use that to keep a large archive of slabs that I return to -- when I have new base layers, I'll often try to start marrying them with older slabs or pieces from them. Most of the time I start these projects from a purely improvisational bent, but sometimes I have a semi-coherent idea of what the end goal is (i.e. Darque: http://zeruch.deviantart.com/art/darque-478706168 ), and I'll also take some bristol sheets or cold press board and paint and draw on that to where I think things need to be specific to an idea.  Then the rest of the time (which is often non-trivial) is playing in layers, histograms and color balance/selection/replacement, until a complete stage is reached.  I also remix my own images,in that sometimes I'll return to stuff ages later and try to rework it with whatever new knowledge I've gleaned. The result is generally very cathartic for me, because its process driven discovery, and I can ignore or repeat the processes as needed (there is no kind of 'forced chain of steps).  Basically you are correct that I am heavily materials based, but once those materials make it to a surface, what can be extracted and interpolated is totally open ended.  Oddly, I still consider myself far more of a traditional artist than a digital one.  Nothing is sacred, everything is allowed.
Also, you can absolutely make another post here asking for assistance to find resources to find a place to live.
90%? Give me a fucking break man that's not possible I don't care if you go to USC or wherever. Bigger cities = more volume = more hot chicks AND more ugly chicks. I have traveled a ton and the only place I've ever seen a huge difference in attractiveness in the population is Hollywood, people there seemed to be in better physical shape but a face is a face no matter how much you exercise or how healthy you eat.
There's a higher-res still here: http://i.imgur.com/1CnrI.jpg  As Akintudne and juanjing point out, it's a clear wheel or similar.
Only if you preface it with something you had no part in creating. Like race, nationality etc etc
It's worth pointing out that US politics usually (always?) classifies foreign enemies as inherently insane. This is actually a dangerous foreign policy position to take, but it's culturally convenient for us. If we had to accept that our opponents are sane then we'd have to deal with more difficult questions.  This has an interesting correlation to American super hero mythos. I remember being a kid and watching super hero movies like Batman and actually finding it strange that the villains were only ever insane and that no otherwise valid reason was given for their behavior. Of course they had backstories that explain how they went insane, but the insanity factor was the common basis. I think it has to do with the way Americans perceive conflicts in terms of good versus evil. I remember debating with people on Reddit about the fact that the Nazis even had a rationale (even if it was flawed) for exterminating Jews. Many people emotionally insisted that the Nazis had *no* rationale. Like, what the hell fantasy world do you live in?
Oh thank you! And yay! The ears are actually my sisters but they are so adorable! 
I know a lot off his value is tired to defense but he has been a well above average 3rd baseman by war
Laptop ram
Jesus.  That's just about the best way to do that.  Fuck the Cubs and all, but Epstein has his act together. I wish Mozeliak was taking notes.  Fuck it, I wonder if we can offer Epstein more money to come be our G.M.
7,4/10?  *Nice*.
Exactly. I'm not saying he should be used as an example of "CHRISTIANITY BAD!" because that's stupid, but when the guy's motivation was clearly religious you can't ignore that just because you don't like the implications of it. 
And The Darkness, early ps3 title.
You could always try nice fitting skinny pants or possibly jeggings which tend to be thicker. Comfortable skinny dress pants that have already been mentioned could work too
You've broken rule 5. No "Should I buy or wait?" posts.
&gt; stuck in my room with extremely limited mobility for the next 6 weeks.   &gt; 6 weeks of xboxlive  Its almost too perfect
If it makes you feel any better, I'm from Finland too. And while I don't personally know any guys my height, there are plenty of people who are 170 cm-ish so don't worry :) School can feel tough, but these kind of things start feeling less bad (usually) when you get older. 
Spirit Breaker likes this.
oh so.... it really got released after all?? Thanks Valve &lt;3 
/r/stonerjokes
This submission has been randomly featured in /r/serendipity, a bot-driven subreddit discovery engine. More here: http://www.reddit.com/r/Serendipity/comments/2kxpl9/im_not_injured_and_i_can_climb_just_fine_just/
classy guy as always... Love how you post 30 threads asking for free advice, then instantly turn and insinuate all dentists are scum the next day. You sir are a douche
I'm not sure what SausageLegs is referring to when he says "Buck was actually better of the two", but if he *is* referring to Reynolds, I think he's correct. Reynolds was worse. But by no means am I saying Buck was not bad.
Yep, and she was okay and we had many a adventures over the past month that were pretty funny.
Can't help it: when I panic, I river dance. 
FYI the poetics price for the PLD weapon is not correct.  It only takes 7 tokens to purchase.  
 chills()
I hope you enjoy the reception.
Let's be honest. At least the title has the word "suspected" in it. 
lol you don't care that he has won titles with pretty much every team he has coached so far? Okay...  Obviously he is a great leader or he wouldn't have had the success he has had.
added, mine is 1736-2521-7317
Someone claimed he didn't?
Providing some info would have been useful.  Does it only happen when trying to load a particular save? do previous autosaves work? Is it a modded game?
This list takes me back. I loved 80s tag team wrestling. I know people shit on Powers of Pain, but I loved their face feud and eventual heel feud with Demolition.   Over in NWA/WCW they had some great teams too. Road Warriors, Steiners, Freebirds, Rock N Roll Express, Midnight Express, Arn &amp; Tully..  The WWE should bring back the Survivor Series matches with a bunch of tag teams like they had when the PPV started.
A - exceedingly petty  B - I don't believe you're a teacher. Here and hear, while homophones, are not the same word and should not be used interchangeably.
I can't recall the number, but there's two SCPs that are connected. A school bus goes missing and ended up on Titan or Europa, and now a school bus goes around dropping off clones of one of the kids who was on the bus. I want to say its a series 2. Anyone want to weigh in?
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cHcKzzgYnMs The ones that claim to be Biblical Israelites aren't even the same people. They just are a religion that claim to be to want their home land back. Which they don't even have ties with. It's a religion nothing more.  
Ggggggggoooose!!
are you going to reuse any parts of your old pc?
The problem OP was referring to was that there exists a double standard in this subreddit about enforcing those reddit rules, not necessarily about the rules themselves.   OP is calling for consistent enforcement of the rule, by either enforcing it totally or not at all.
It helps prevent thrush from developing. So I guess like getting your tonsils out on the threat of those disgusting tonsilith pus things. 
Let's say I ask you to solve a rubik's cube. Are you going to just start turning the blocks around in any direction and hope that it works? Or are you going to pick a side first, complete it and then move onto the next step/side?   Programming is the same. If you want to build a simple Android app that takes a photo and then emails it to a set of friends, you have to build it logically. First you would want to make a button that when pressed on, opens up the camera app. Then you would want to add in a textfield that takes in valid emails, and finally, you email. That's what it means to break down the problem.   You're still in high school. You've barely touched cs. Your friend can solve problems in a better way because he has the experience (he's a software engineer). Give it another few years and you'll have the experience too. It's good that you've already started programming in hs. 
Wow just wow, I need a GIF at that steal + goal!
So like 75% of God's word is complete trash, then? And where does God say in Leviticus about murdering you?
[They're actual actors!](http://i.imgur.com/gSGahCq.jpg) They did [an interview some years ago](http://youtu.be/SlaRHYni17A?t=1m52s) (the actor who plays Dispy [intentionally "adds reggae"](http://youtu.be/SlaRHYni17A?t=2m7s)).  I don't know anything about Sunny, but it does get [pretty.. interesting, sometimes](http://youtu.be/1E9Z0-ppTl0?t=41m56s). Dipsy has some [nice moves though](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=axt0joRkQCA). And Laa-Laa really [knows how to play guitar](http://youtu.be/In3ajQ__ohA?t=7m56s).
&gt;    &gt;  &gt;  &gt;  &gt; For figures in antiquity, that is an unreasonable standard. If you're going to apply the same standard to every single figure in history, you're going to be forced to conclude that almost everyone ever has not existed. There is simply not that kind of evidence for the ancient world; that's the reality of it. A lot of evidence simply doesn't survive.  That's simply not true, and even your goto example had physical evidence going for him.   &gt; just like we would be foolish to reject the Bible.    No, we would be morons of massive proportions to accept it.   &gt; And we would be foolish to expect coins or something similar for Jesus.    Coins, yes, of course. He wouldn't have been a ruler. Contemporary texts, no. The bible describes him as a very popular figure, a celebrity even (Matthew 4:23-25; John 12:12-19).   &gt; Are they attested by other important historians, such as Tacitus or Josephus?   Actually, at least one of those was written by a non-Norse! Snorri Sturlusson was a christian.   Anyway, you claim was that the fact the bible had several authors was evidence itself, not Tacitus and Josephus.   Too bad the Tacitus and Josephus mentions were medieval forgeries. &gt; And one Bart Ehrman is worth thousands of Richard Dawkins on the matter of Jesus' historicity. Dawkins is a brilliant biologist, but he has no place arguing about history. History is not a science, and should not be treated as such.   He's got every right to doubt unsourced beliefs, as does anyone else. &gt; Again, if you seriously doubt the historical existence of Jesus, offer an alternate explanation of how Christianity sprang up around his teachings within 5 or 10 years of his death, as Paul records in Galatians. Without any sort of alternate explanation, that theory is bunk.   That onus is not on me. I need not offer any alternate explanations. This is the problem with theists: when they don't know, instead of saying "I don't know", they posit wild hypotheseses. We don't do that.   Not that it's hard to understand how christianity spread so fast: the poison is well-crafted. It's academic to wonder exactly how it did, one can only bemoan the fact that it did.   Polytheists were a lot more tolerant and progressive than monotheists, overall.
Nah at Chelsea he made everybody afraid with his wasteful shots, banter should be about that
Who is Oliver Campbell? I think I missed something. Could someone fill me in?
nu nanami is best girl
give_title k_riverlands (insert char id here) will immediately give it to you. Alternatively you can colonize Oldstones and hope you get the event that gives you a claim. Or you can fabricate claims on other high lordships until you either have enough to get the plot to fabricate a claim on the kingdom or are able to usurp the title from its current owner.
* PS4 * North America / Seattle * 30 Hunter  * PSN: THEFAILKING32 * [Bungie.net profile for those interested](http://www.bungie.net/en/Legend/2/4611686018428663526/2305843009217285130)  Looking to help lower levels or even higher one VoG, Nightfall,Weekly. Have a mic.
That still makes no sense.  Also, you've switched from good to bad numerous times... your self.  You're such a hypocrite.
I mean in the stores. 
I just think the OLine is inconsistent and the defense is poor enough we lose to better NE, PHI and DET. And BUF is better than you think. I think they win too. Lambeau Field doesn't have the big advantage that it once did and not the noise advantage of NO or SEA. 
Creo recordar que en los Estatutos que hemos aprobado, hay alguna línea relativa a este tema. No es que crea en la dictadura de la mayoría, al contrario, soy un minoritario militante.  Pero lo que sí creo es en la necesidad de dotarnos, como organización, de unas normas, porque de lo contrario seríamos, no sé, por decir algo, el club de fans de Pablo Iglesias.  Así pues, hablar de "miedo", cuando lo que ha habido es una decisión mayoritaria; o de "ingenuos incompetentes", cuando lo que se ha puesto sobre la mesa es la ineludible necesidad de una organización, creo simplemente que sobra. Un saludo,,
Derek Law maybe? 
I think it's harder to cut cops slack when so many of them are power-hungry dickweeds. Nurses, on the other hand, are generally angels walking this earth. They get slack.
The Police.  The Wallflowers. Crash Test  Dummies YNot. 
Master this. It sounds amazing.
Absolutely filthy. That sway verse was nuts and I'm glad it's on a track. Excited as fuck for this abum.
It's a fair point, but I am more of an aficianado of shit like pedantry over what we can REALLY call a Philly cheesesteak.  But, hey, it's not Anita Sarkeesian.
It happens to my husband all the time. There have been nights where I counted 6 occurrences. It used to happen to me when I was a kid so I know how horrifying it is :(
There wasn't even an awning.
It's good for long idles.  lets you progress further while you are asleep etc
'Trick or tr-'   'Woah... Ok forget the candy, just give us a copy of the template for your Haunter pumpkin and we're all good here.'
Same here, checking in. I also have a life as well. I also don't try to find excuses to get pissed off at everything.
Please call an ambulance right now. And if you are in the US call this number right after: 1-800-784-2433  We'll be hear to talk also, but please call the ambulance right now.
Andy Reid's "Diet" plan?
I've got to see this movie
To feel nothing would be Rinhuman.
http://i.imgur.com/UsOTM6Q.png
I think the old one looks better...
+/u/dogetipbot 13 doge 
Going to Kasllys tomorrow morning actually. CANT WAIT! 
The DMG also has a ton of pages pertaining to treasure (90 pages, or about 1/3rd of the book), which is only sampled in the basic rule pdf. Most of the treasure pages are describing the magic items, but it will probably include how much treasure should be owned by a given entity.
&gt;This includes but is not limited to finding and uncovering corruption in the industry, and not putting up with it.  In response to this, do you know of the Shadow of Mordor/Youtube brand deal? The original contracts on this were very shady on WB's part and falls right in line with Gamergate's supposed aims but went largely ignored by the movement once exposed. What is your opinion on this?
Thanks for doin this!!!
Not sure why this is getting downvoted. You should hack into ctOS and change the rule before they take this down.
Those are for the /r/awwnime contest not mine.   Mine is in summer while Best Guy Contest is in December 20th.
Buttheads.
How? I haven't been able to use my music files with Run Zombies yet, I only hear the story. :(
This one should be correct. I'm sorry for taking your time, I'll send you an ability capsule for your troubles.
Not usually unless we told them. 
It will be very interesting to see what happens with Interorbital. I like that they're doing the OTRAG idea. As you say though, they haven't done any customer launches yet. I certainly hope they can keep their prices low as they move forward.  [Spaceflight Services](http://spaceflightservices.com/pricing-plans/) shows prices that start at $300k for 5kg payload. They've launched 10 payloads as secondaries on 6 vehicles in the past two years.  I expect people would be willing to pay somewhat more to be the primary customer for a launch.  On the gripping hand, if it were a sure-fire business opportunity, someone would already be doing it. Interorbital's people think they can make it work (though their rocket design is quite different from what I posted above), but it remains to be seen if they can pull it off.
It is enough to generate $33,000/year for 30 years without any gains.  If you figure even 6% gains you can get $60,000/year without even touching the principle.  Add that to the $15,000/year you will get from Social Security, and that isn't terrible, even in the future.  
Found it! The mothers name is Cala Craves and here's the only scene I could find. Unfortunately it's not the entire scene but its something. http://www.xnxx.com/video341915/teen_seduces_mature_woman
We're just not the same defensively without him...sucks.
Oh, I thought he had 5 to's, my bad. But ya, an overall awful performance, one that will go down in the history books. 
Green Green Super Green.  You made our Halloween !
[](/abgrin) And I haven't found anyone here as relaxing and fun as you either...  Oh look, I'm smiling again. How do you *do* that?
How the fuck did you get pulled over going 10 over the speed limit? People drive at least 10 over everywhere all the time, more like 20 over on the interstate. I have driven alongside police officers at 85 mph and gotten a friendly wave.
Silly Dustin, you're supposed to hold it in the air and drink champagne from it! not push your face against it!
I'm thinking the comment came from a wizened old fourteenie who obviously has a ton of experience in life.
Sup-ish
Oh Stalin..
This never fails to make me laugh. 
That's what happened in [the koolaid commercial](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ar6xC8KM-jk)s
As I ask every time.... why does he care what they do in the privacy of their own home? People are sick, doesnt matter what color or nationality, none of that matters in ANY issue, ALL people are stupid, panicky, sick, twisted and evil, animals. Just as we are all good, careing, loving, inventive, intuitive. but none of that matters, as its in the privacy of their OWN HOME! meaning he wouldnt see it or know when or who was doing it... I just dont understand why he cares!
That was a totally exhausted player, could barely skate
she did man.. she did it, im happy for her :)
That's just like your opinion man! I wanted Gordon in the draft because I don't want to wait 3 years for Exum, and I wanted a defensive stud. But there are probably good reasons I'm not a gm.
haha this one is the best!
&lt;*calmly sips Lagavulin 16*&gt;
Popped an adderall around 8pm to finish a paper. Planned to stay up all night to finish it.  Ended up finishing the paper around 10, stayed up the entire night browsing reddit. Nothing unusual to report.
Season 21 Episode 4. 
I kinda wish that RDJ didn't become Iron Man, he'd make a great Strange.
*smiles* Thought so. Having fun?
I agree entirely. I don't think it is intentional, and Tolkien can say all he wants that it is not an allegory, but an allegory is indeed what he wrote. 
I like to walk into a room full of programmers and shout: "I have 5 children and 0 apples.  If I distribute the apples evenly between, how many will each child get?"
you can spoof IP addresses just fine.  That's why certificates are used when you need to make sure of the person on the other end.
I used to get the email but haven't for the last several months.  I wouldn't even know I was over unless I visit their website to check.
Sorry, I don't have a pen.
Because I want to be able to look down on other smarks goddammit! 
Im good so far. I have a few friends that cant turn their system back on after they turn it off.  Not %100 sure whats up with that.
 If you want to game definitely go for windows it has the best selection of games. For an optical drive sadly I cannot help you I don't have an optical drive in my build.
Donate rat poison.. 
Respond to this guy hes fucking terry pratchett
the problem with this priest usually have Multipible buffs just making it RNG if you get the shield or not.  warlock - felhunter dispel has a long CD and only dispels 1 thing.  DK's icy touch, first requires a glyph and second requires a rune, depending on what spec you are this is anywhere from 2-6 uses, and if you use it 6 times well than you have no dmg left.  and than both mage/hunters cost a lot of resource to use 2-3 dispels, and now frost/fire mages don't have any mana gem or evo so it's not like before were you could dispell until you were oom and than regen.  and than also the 5 other classes which don't have a dispel making priest not worth the effort to attack.
under ny
kinda sorta. It'll *work* globally, but it's still not on a few global LTE frequencies
You literally wrote this for your pun. You suck. 
Typing this on my broken (cracked screen, corners cracked, also, somehow bent) shield tablet, I loved it until I broke it, about a month after I got the thing, dropped it... Onto carpet... From about 3-4 feet... I have pics of it, [here ya go, BTW](http://imgur.com/a/OM6vE) really want to get it replaced...
Still, please say there's something in the works and when I say in the works is a plausible three/six month solution, not the incalculable "investigating a proper way to develop a remedy to attend.....". Sometimes even though you guys are communicating the message seems so bland and empty, we know you sympathize with our passion to the game we know is hard to handle a company who grew so fast and blablabla but let's get to the main point where when the things we are asking for years will be done. My texting seems a little hostile but I don't know how to sound less harsh.
Britain didn't. 
Lemony Snicket is a well known anti-Olafist.  His accounts might easily have been embellished to present Olaf in an unfavorable light.
Because patriarchy.
I'm glad people are liking them and still participating! I loooove my bed haha! 
ELI5 your average week for us then.
Thought of [this](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vlxkcewBEe0) when i read your comment!
Really? You're not gonna go with "Hawaiian Punch?"
He wasn't.  He was just pretending to be an idiot.  AintAintAWord just didn't realize he wasn't being serious.
Yeah that's weird, and it makes me think something might be up with the actual espresso device. You could also try grinding coarser in steps until you can get it to properly flow out - if you're lucky, it'll be at a suitable grind level for still doing espresso.
So an extra from the walking dead wandered off the set, ate you outta house and home then upon detection just kool-aid manned it through your wall? Thanks for that interesting visual!
&gt; It's my belief that hunters do not want a naturally stable population of deer because they want to be able to hunt and kill for sport.  Well, you have believe what you want, but it's not grounded in anything factual.  A healthy population is necessary to being able to continue to hunt for years to come.  Hunters want to continue being able to hunt.  Being able to hunt means a large number of animals. Additionally, Deer in a lot of places are exceeding their carrying capacity.   Without hunting, they would overwhelm the food supply in those areas, which doesn't just affect deer, but the other species in the area.  But, hey, letting deer and other species starve to death is morally superior than hunting them and having the meat go to help feed people, right?
dont worry bro you werent the first person to reply with that.  you're not alone!  there are literally dozens of you!
[Foch's review](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ve4LK_8Q3mY&amp;list=UUYmKvoh0a_7yx0PKNtSSrNA)
Didn't work for me on Trevor's trailer or La Fuente Blanca ranch house.  Am I doing it wrong?
It'd be nice to have a switch for GPRS where I live it's more useable than edge 
the present you get every 5 levels
If your taste is anything like mine, which it seems to be, you'll love it. Like how Bebop was mostly jazz and blues, and Champloo was hip hip and tranquil, Dandy is funk and soul. Though there is plenty of rock and other stuff, too. But awesomeness!
I've got another one if you haven't gotten one yet
&gt; I mostly mean that I can go in public and say vile shit about our president, I can kiss a person of the same gender. I can also, as Steven Segal did, show obvious support for Putin and Russia. I can say obscenities, I can produce independent movies about our own country's war crimes.  That's because to those in power, gay marriage matters not. The locals can fight over it while those in power stay in power. However, you're really exaggerating gay rights in the US. There's still many **states** where you can get fired for being gay. And queer bashings still happen. And, just a fun fact, a higher percent of black men are in prison right now in the U.S. then during South African apartheid.  &gt;systematic oppression of free speech, manipulation of public opinion, intentional data distortion that happens every day in Russia. Why, as an academic, would I want to be a coerced empty voice?   The media system is run by a group of 5 or 6 oligarchic companies. It's not state run like in Russia, but it's still pretty bad, IMO. Yes, you can make your own shitty blog, no you won't change the public opinion with it.  &gt;There is a reason Russia's population has been sinking like the Titanic and their male life expectancy is pitiable. That isn't the West's fault!  Never said it is.  &gt;Bear in mind also that Russian exploitation of Belarus and Ukraine led starving citizens to cannibalism and killed millions (~1933).  If I can bring up atrocities that the U.S. did back then... There's just so many. I'm going to ignore that and lead to the assumption that both governments have changed, and the cold war made both do some shady shit.  &gt;They killed many more within their own borders. Again, can America be blamed for the parts they have inflicted on themselves?  Again, past. However, how many Natives has the U.S. killed? And put into reservations and then taken their resources after finding them in the tribal lands? This is all recent stuff.  &gt;If Russia has tried to do what the US did during the Iraq War with misleading information, they have achieved only a piecemeal farce.   Maybe outside of Russia, yes. But inside? They are doing fine.  &gt;The achilles heal of their previously-growing economy is exposed to the world.   Gas? It was not exposed, it was well known. And They are getting more and more connected to China.   &gt;Also, don't forget how many of the internationally rich are indeed Russians themselves.  There's a few. However, the majority of them are bankers, politicians, and businessmen. And almost all are from the U.S. and Western Europe.  Want actual examples of what the U.S. does?   http://www.amazon.com/Confessions-Economic-Hit-John-Perkins/dp/0452287081  Or go look up the Banana wars, Pinochet, Depleted Uranium in Iraq, the deals that the IMF and World Bank give nations that give it money in exchange for austerity measures that take away money from the people in governments. It doesn't matter to they whether or not gays can get married.   I'm not exactly pro-Russia. I'm Anti-U.S. And there is a long history of the U.S. forcing revolutions in regions it deems unfriendly, which is where Maiden started. And before you say I'm wrong, seriously, look up Pinochet. Look up the Bay of Pigs. Or here, just look through this list.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Covert_United_States_foreign_regime_change_actions
I like the name "Cum Cookie" better
Too be honest, this sort of distributed identity/PIM store is exactly what I have been looking for.  Syncthing can share and maintain files between devices, this means you can use it as a contact, calendar and data storage medium without having to use a centralised service like Google. Granted, I would have much rather seen it implemented as some sort of 3rd party credential store for Android, FirefoxOS or other platforms rather than their own OS, but perhaps that might come further down the line.  Also, using Syncthing as a basis for their own F2F social media platform is genius and something I've also been waiting on for a while.
 Guppy's  Head, Tail and 9  Lives.  The worst. 
The ultimate Karma slut. At least work for your karma by reposting, and fabricating stories like the rest of us.
How far along are you? It may not be clear after the first read through, because on the one hand you're too busy trying just to keep up with the awesomeness to process the sometimes roundabout infodump explanation.  Which is studded with zen koans.  But the explanation ends up being pretty awesome.  Feel free to ask questions. 
Well there is the GOP, and then there is the Arizona GOP.
[](/ssdismissal) \*vague allusions to future happenings*
This is awkward. I literally thought that was Snow Tha Product but with blonde hair. My complement is invalid now.  
Awww, that really sucks man, I wish you a speedy recovery, I know how much that can suck. I broke every rib on my right side about 6 years ago in a sports accident, chest cast for half a year, was not fun. 
Maybe this is what they were doing all those "Stress Tests" for? 
Your submission is not directly linking to the image and has been removed. Please copy the url of the image itself, and not the page it is on. Make sure your submission url ends in .jpg or .png or .gif  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAdviceAnimals) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Damn I haaate people that do this! Chocolate is sacred man, you don't eat someones chocolate without asking first. Ugh, so disrespectful and annoying.
I've posted some on here before!
*content directly related to league of legends*
Yup. It sucks in order to teach you to be a drone.   That's why people like me excelled as soon as we are taken out of those type of environments
They look great.  Why the pussys on TMZ always got beef, they need new jobs...
I knew this was too easy!
Have a good birthday, Turd!
I've been single for over a year. I'm not one for casual sex, and I really don't want a relationship. However, part of me really, really wants to get laid. I'm a bit conflicted at the moment. 
Man....
Let Down - Radiohead
Eminem(hip hop/ Rap), Rise Against(Rock), Mayday Parade(alternative), Mindsight (alternative)
I don't think its a problem trying to replace her, I couldn't imagine myself with someone else and I'd rather be alone than fill the gap she left. It's going to be so hard seeing her move on
I was training a new hire in accounts payable. She had just graduated with a BA in Accounting. She asked me "What do those parenthesis around the numbers mean?"  She was not kidding.  
Why? They fear this man. They know he sees further than they and he will bind them with ancient logics.
Not gonna lie, a lot of feels were felt throughout this.   Halo was the first time I really got into gaming, it introduced me into the arena of buying stuff JUST to play a game.   Halo 2 was just something else. This video...was just amazing. The passion and drive that everyone had in this was very apparent. 
is this still occuring? I'd like: mewtonite y Charizardite x pinsirite aggronite houndoomite one each :D Thanks :D
Where is Berta Lovejoy when you need her
Nice review! I felt the same way as you with 1992 and Crunch Addict. I think I vaped those two so much that I've somewhat OD'd on em and they taste funny to me now.   Just a heads up on Sasquatch. It's best after about two weeks of aging. The nutty flavor and everything else about it seems blossom with time. 
Why thank you - getting it now!
I fucking despise sOaz but saying he isnt top 3 toplaners Europe and generally a great asset would be stupid. Cyanide on the other hand...
it's great to see muzzin filling in for voynov
Probably: Havok  Maybe: Disfiguring the Goddess  Maybe not:Akroma  Nope: Imperanon
No, not several years. Maybe a year or two at the rate he's going. And if other volunteers join in, hopefully lesser time.
After thanksgiving, definitely. Don't ruin the holiday and he may agree with you. Good luck.
This needs more up votes
Automated tests are good at making sure an API works correctly and can handle edge cases, or that subsystems are performing typically small tasks correctly.  A lot of the problems the game had were not problems that automated testing could address.  The biggest launch issues were:  * Crashing on certain hardware / configurations * Performance * Game balance / stylistic preferences * Graphical issues
Hey, Amberrgerr! Fancy meetin' you over here in this sub :)
It was an episode of Lost.
Nap-of-the-Earth. Basically means its flying very low altitude.
$9~ savings. 
I can help you guys out.  Message me on Xbox and I'll see if I'm available. My GT is Cynycal.
How is that backwards? The reason they are using the sp at lv50 probably isn't too get 75 kills, since you know playing in attrition would give you that in like 10 games tops...   They use sp because they just want to stomp people with it to get MVPs. You saying "they have to" at lvl 50 is almost certainly not true... They do it because they are lazy and don't want to try hard for 50 MVP wins with the car or carbine. Not saying I blame them, but let's be real here, they aren't spamming sp because they have a hard time getting kills   Nothing is backwards in that logic. Using the condescending "you do realize..." opening statement on the other hand is unnecessarily douchey
After episode 12 shit gets real and there is plenty of feels. Up until episode 12 treat it as a slice of life with some sci-fi mixed in? How far into the show did you get? If you on episode 1 you have like four hours to endure while if your on episode 8 its only a bit more until the good part.   I am on episode 22 and don't see why Kurisu is best girl, I mean she is great but other people complained that other girls where tsundere and Mary-sue characters while Kurisu a perfect example of a tsundere and Mary-sue. The show does hit the feels if you allow it to.  
Elucidator x Lambent Light
ALRIGHT IT'S 8:00, LET'S GO
Honestly I know how you feel. I used to hate pvp(used to suck too) ever since I got the last word however it has changed pvp for me and I can feel myself getting better with experience now.  I have gone from disliking to now loving pvp. It's all I do now.  Tip start with shotguns/fusion rifles there super easy to use one shot kills. Then upgrade to weapons that require you to get consistent head shots.
But when OP has already admitted that himself, it does nothing but kick someone when they're down. Lecture him as much as you want, but he still deserves to get the advice to correct his mistakes.
is u gaiz find princez taera yet? cek teh stanz n teh shelfs
Predicted* grammar and my ability to proof read have never been my strongpoints
Lol spam 
Five more years of Muschamp.
So you bought them all twice?
Yeah I see the attachments for the paw effects in the schema but they don't appear to be working in game.  I'll poke someone about it.
I will say this experience has given me a new respect for you right wing blokes. Still a democratic socialist, but the one thing it has done for the more left leaning members here is humanize you guys. You aren't "The Republican Menace". You're just people. I know that sounds kind of crazy but the far left has a habit of dehumanizing the opposition.  
Probably. *she grins* I'm a bit out of it.
I thought it was a fan of Nicole of BB16 fame that had gone to far. [qt3.14](http://i1127.photobucket.com/albums/l627/FORTstaff/bb16/bb16_0012_Nicole-Franzel_zps4101f238.png)
I got the same problem .. exept that i actually can play multiplayer .. but only for a certain time. So after a random number of summons invasions and what not, i get the exect same freeze and disconnect as you. I also made a [thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/DarkSouls2/comments/2h0gdh/pc_losing_connection_to_steam_when_summoning/) if you're intrested
Whelp, it looks like I have a ship now. In all seriousness though, Home village makes the most sense, or he has family out there.
Hey! It still needs those 300 MB there!
It's a smidge  ridiculous to see her mom wearing lingerie everywhere.  I guess i'm behind the times.
Lebrons dick is his rock, he'll be fine.
That's awesome. Worried you are being optimistic about the paychecks though.
You betcha. I mostly just lurk so I don't really have an account.  Plus, I figured anyone's first thought would be "Seriously?" :P
Yes, FAA has minimum crew requirement based on seating capacity. 
Damn Indy is beating Memphis by 13.
For those who can read it, I'm ~~Pseudo~~ 60and80. I'll be moderating your posts - *be nice and constructive.* Feel free to sling me a line. :)  Because efficiency through plagiarism is the best policy. But seriously. Be nice, guys.
if i was a mod i would ban you for this post.
It even has a [Wikipedia page](http://fr.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pénis_de_Raspoutine).
For people who are trying to be dismissive, that sure is a lot of tweets.
Photos of the ship breaking up:  http://i.imgur.com/C7QIx7F.jpg  http://i.imgur.com/qNKtiwZ.jpg  http://i.imgur.com/8vL1Ugx.jpg
Good, because I certainly don't want to change.
Dang hopefully it is nothing serious. 
she says it herself in her voice lines
On the contrary, most female astronauts clearly didn't earn their spot fairly and only went into space because of affirmative action. 
I had the idea to drench myself in fake blood and wear a sheet over my head with a ghost drawn on it  ghostface killaaa
Datsyuk just doing datsyuk things..
Hi there, it looks like you'd like to discuss Halloween! We have a megathread up and request you participate there instead. [Follow this link to the thread!](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/2kfps9/mod_post_halloween_megathread_2014/)   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Happy jajajalapeno
Aaaand that defense out scored the packers. Just sayin. 
Here is what the linked meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:  #***Insanity Wolf*** &gt;***Post Title:***  *Why aren't I allowed to shoot them with my BB gun?*   &gt;***Top:***  *14 YEAR OLD KIDS WITHOUT COSTUMES*   &gt;***Bottom:***  *GIVE US CANDY OR WE'LL  VANDALIZE YOUR SHIT!!!*  [Original Link^1](http://imgur.com/TOsTMuk) | [Meme Template^2](http://imgur.com/memegen/create/TOsTMuk)
The best ones are in the substitutes Cryptiano Ronaldo, George Beast.
Lion is the spookiest and is not in picture why come?
No shit huh? lol Im assuming his primary focus involves reviving, ie. normal raid, nightfalls, weekly heroic strike etc. I dont understand how a hard raid w/o revives has anything to do with these activities.
Edmontonian here - I'm not a fan of rock/punk but I've seen USS 3 times...they're awesome! 
RIP me, I lost all my betting items today. Never again betting. It's been a good and long run, but it's time to back out.   http://imgur.com/i7COscN
Charges can't be dropped after a sentence has been given.
NBC cancels everything, which is why I try not to get invested in their programs until they appear on Netflix.
Keiji is crustacean type, he can regrow his limbs like Asimov. He lost his eye against that big roach and regrew it later on.
And it was actually paying off until this past Thursday. 
No, that's true.  But as far as I'm concerned a check is just a piece of paper (certified or not).  I have no clue as to wether or not it's fake, and I won't know that instantly.  I feel like with electronic systems, you get more of an instant confirmation that the account is valid.  I would also suspect paying for something on a debit card then closing the account constitutes some form of bank fraud.
wut
Sorry, didn't see. Deleting post.  
Yeah man that sounds like it would work for me. I'm out tonight and won't be able to send pictures until tomorrow, is that ok for you?  Feel free to send pics tomorrow as well. 
VHS 2
Hi there, it looks like you'd like to discuss Halloween! We have a megathread up and request you participate there instead. [Follow this link to the thread!](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/2kfps9/mod_post_halloween_megathread_2014/)   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Audition. 
I can't find a specific one I saw a while back, but here is a brief [NIH review.](http://pubs.niaaa.nih.gov/publications/arh284/205-212.htm) In particular, you may want to look at the "Effects On Neuropsychological Performance" section, and the "Drinking Patterns" subsection, in the "Moderating Factors" section.
Glass House is my favorite so far. Beautiful inside and out, and the wife of the owner is a chocolatier who makes and sells amazing chocolates...wine is good too.
Don't lock the strings.
I think the age thing is really throwing off my argument I am not saying he is too old to get a contract. In fact im saying hes young enough that its ODD that he doesn't. Someone like Hall Gill yea I can see why hes unsigned but a former top 20 draft pick in arguably the prime of his career at 31 as a defense men should not be left unsigned into the season.   Emery was not leftovers when we got him he was a hot backup goalie who could of gotten signed by a handful of teams. The difference is Carlo was wanted by no one. If we didnt sign Emery someone would of. 
IGN: Fazyn  Age: 14  PvP Skill: 7.5/10  BB Skill: 9.5/10  Strengths: Very good base bitcher and very active! Have friends in the faction. (RapistZ, six753, PistonMyKid, benwe10)  Past Factions: KeopS, Punch, NWA and some others (I play Kohi Facs since map 8)  Betrayals: None  What can you bring to Vene? A very good basebitcher (I'm good at repairing sets, brewing pots, building, etc.) Very active and helpful, I won't let you down!
durant and westbrook are not that old :&gt; 
&gt; According to Everett, the Pirahã have no concept of a supreme spirit or god,[11] and they lost interest in Jesus when they discovered that Everett had never seen him. They require evidence based on personal experience for every claim made.[5] However, they do believe in spirits that can sometimes take on the shape of things in the environment. These spirits can be jaguars, trees, or other visible, tangible things including people  Spirits is a far cry from a god - which they consciously object to.
Njet.avi
Faggot.
Because I'm being called occupant here already.
I just ran out of juice completely,  waiting on vapemaillllll.
The issue with the Iowan one isn't that it could ever be true, it's that it's clearly meant to mislead and intimidate. The New York thing is pretty fucked as well, but it doesn't make the Iowa one any better, nor should you understate how scummy it is.
Yep, that's a BLEVE. The explosion on the show, though, wasn't.
pls :(
~~&gt; watchable this year~~  ~~We've been pretty decent the last couple of years? What team have you been watching?~~  edit: My bad guys. I read that as "We were bad in the past, now we're good." I apologize.
As a caffeine addict, I am upset I did not get this shirt.
I think it's supposed to be Logan's head. It certainly looks like it to me.
We used to play a kind of game of it in high school. I had two friends with INSANELY curly hair, and mine was wavy but quite the large frizzy poof ball. Over the day we'd secretly hide small items in each other's hair and see if the other noticed/how long it took to fall out. My friend's biggest record was like 10 coins and a few other objects before she noticed. I got to 7 pen/pencils.
This is must be an extremely serious case of the Mondays. 
I guess you could just avoid both
I suppose you're right that a true moc has to have two pieces of leather sewn together. These have raised stitching, which I dislike
They dropped him for personal reasons. Merk didnt want to be in the house any more or team with the rest of the roster so it was a mutual parting. 
There are going to be a ton of Korean top laners available soon. Shouldn't be too hard to find one better then Wickd.  I mean, either Acorn or Looper will be free agent.
Thanks! Indeed I am. Got bored looking through etsy for posters and decided to just make my own. But when I'm done, I'll give you guys the files so you can go print 'em off yourselves.
We already had our trap against Memphis. We better not have 2 trap games in one season. 
They don't want to fight it because the argument becomes how easy it is to make these purchases. They don't want to make it more difficult, it's a rabbit hole they never want to mess with.
Put this on the citizenship test. If you see a disabled person, elderly person, pregnant woman, or someone else that needs to sit you: i: Ignore the Individual   ii:   Look around and see if anyone is getting up first   iii:  Smile and ask if they want a seat If your answer was iii, Welcome to Canada! As a note, I take the subway at least twice a day and MOST people are extremely courteous. Only thing I would like is that some women, mostly girls, tone it down a little talking about their sexual escapades.  Late night, who cares?   Bitching about cleaning up after anal?  Not the right time during rush hour, but I am an old sod I guess.
Would you like to bet on that? :^)
YAY! This is actually something I've wanted to see. Scarra as coach that is. 
IFTTT
Yes, I thought that, but then who would go support and as you say Yellowstar is an excellent support. I was wondering whether one of the loose Koreans could be persuaded since Korea is in such disarray. I know Heart is supposed to be retiring but perhaps he might fancy EU as an alternative.
The first paragraph was concerning. I'm no physicist but aren't laws called such because they can never be wrong?
Probably Heard of: Daft Punk  Might Have Heard of: Cake  One That People Probably Have not Heard of: Nujabes  One That No One Has Heard of: Fat Freddys Drop
CRD runs on Linux as well. However, you need to provide a custom X session script for it to use if you plan on using the background server, otherwise it will silently fail to enable. Also, each client will have its own X session, which might be a good or bad thing, depending on your use case.
It has to happen this year.  It looks like the show runners have allowed GRRM more time by adding flashbacks this season and admitting that there might be a season 8.  I assume that we'll get a couple of book-spoilers this season, but that overall the show will be fully caught up to book 5 by the end.  It HAS to happen.
&lt;3
theyre all holding umbrellas, but wouldnt the rain feel nice?
He certainly looks a bit disgruntled by the experience (it's very cute!)
3 Leaf Audio are all very awesome. 
I'd like to see evidence that the majority of a school's budget goes to sports. In my experience sports funding comes mostly from fundraising 
No problem.
I don't know why anybody trusts this guy to be fantasy relevant. 
Yes 50% more space :)
can i plz get the xbox live gold 2 day trail:) thank you
I don't really have one. As a KV-2 driver I'm equally terrified of any tank that's fast enough to rush me while I'm reloading :)
Gg if only you didnt crit Talonflame
Do I start him over alfred morris? Hill has the better matchup..
Make sure if it's Korean or Chinese though 
I heard e'bowl a big problem nowadays. 
[Indeed](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hlhWOneOatg)
I do it for quick access. I barely look at my front page. Also, to avoid spoilers would be another acceptable answer.
EST. Just got off work and grabbed some schlafly pumpkin and subway. Going to shower and get ready! Anyone have an aud or video stream? 
FINALLY!! AWESOME NEWS :D! \o/ I'm already a fan :3
Average 97's average $3-400. Normally modifications like that would be a detriment to the value but people like their trench guns, real or fake. Again, might be a little high and probably not something I'd buy but if youre looking for a neat range toy, you could do worse.
He wasn't even at XOXOFest! What an amateur! 
[White Trash Halloween ft. chink](http://imgur.com/a/mr2ee)
Ya for me that was my only accident. I remember last time I told this story on reddit I got chewed out like no other people telling I could have killed someone. I had 10 road workers telling me it was her fault but insurance companies don't care. I switched insurance companies because I gave them the construction workers info to call and after they found me liable I asked if they called any of them and they told me they had. I call the construction workers and the insurance never called any of them. 
Working for minimum wage doesn't mean you have to live in the ghetto.
Aaaaaaaaand the shit hits the fan again.
This sub has an incredibly intelligent group of users. Wiki and Google are great but having access the cumulative knowledge of the users here is a remarkable opportunity. The well researched and reasoned answers above perfectly illustrate this. 
That Big 12 Championship knocked out a lot of national championship contenders in the last moment possible. I would be pretty happy with round robin too.
Sam Walton, richest man in America for 6 straight years, was famous for driving a Ford pickup that had one of the headlights duct taped on.
He started vaporizing before he even hit the ground
can i get a drip of gold?
compatible with long war?
Astroturfed operation by right-wing agitators? Fuckin' check.
Well, you actually do have opinions on sexism in videogames, and those opinions are conservative and involve maintaining the status quo.  I don't mean "conservative" in a negative political sense, I mean it in the literal sense that you don't think things should change. You aren't a pig because you like Bayonetta, and she never says that.  At the beginning of each video, she says something to the effect of "You can enjoy games and still criticize them".  In fact, all of us do this, it just doesn't involve criticizing them in relation to female equality.  It's what is happening in every single video game review you have ever read: the individual is saying they enjoyed the game, but here's where they can do better.  All Anita Sarkeesian is doing is saying she enjoys certain games, but they could do a better job of projecting a positive image of women. The fact that guys are getting so worked up about this is really confusing to me.  If the main character in Bayonetta looked like a normal woman rather than a huge-titted pornstar, would it make the game any less fun?  No, so I don't see why people get so offended and defensive about such a small change to the industry.
Not to try and sound like a dick, but this has nothing to do with the OP. Dude is frustrated and asking for help, not looking for not-so-humble bragging.
Start small and take baby steps until you become more comfortable with the exercises. It's as with Buddhism where you must accept yourself in order to grow.
Judging by his Twitter, and him commenting on here saying it's not trolling, I guess it seems to be the case....
http://youtu.be/HsqmU3v0hVA
Solid album
I think tooltips on each item in the inventory is a must, like when you hover your mouse over an item, you should have whatever information you need about it.  I think that's pretty much universal feature of any inventory system.
Frontier like the Wild West ? DVR is some magic lady code for "turn off the PS4"
&gt; Everyone comes in with preconceived notions, and TB's act is ultimately a false one due to the impossibility of objectivity.  TB's first response about gamergate was this: http://www.twitlonger.com/show/n_1s4nmr1/. Everyone would consider this a neutral stance with a focus on something he cares about, DMCA requests (since it affects his work). Because of this neutral stance, he was harassed/bullied a lot by the anti-GG side back when this wasn't even called gamergate. Yes, you're correct that now he has preconceptions about one side or the other based on his experience, but at least at first he seemed to not care about either side and just focused on what mattered to him.  &gt;His pretension to moderation ultimately means that he gives more credence to GG than is necessary.  This mentality is ultimately what made TB support the pro-GG side more (and what makes other neutral people, like Pakman, also start supporting GG more: http://puu.sh/cy2l1/7cf5f01b7b.png), as I just explained. His neutrality was misconstrued as an attack and so here we are and that's why I said what I said about the "us or them" thing.  However, I already discussed this with someone else regarding why I think he's mostly a reasonable person: http://www.reddit.com/r/GirlGamers/comments/2kqszz/ethics_in_games_media_total_biscuit_interviews/clox7id
You should see us with beards. 😉
All I can do after that one is let out a heavy sigh. Face--&gt;Palm.
My iPhone 6 has problems with certain routers, too. You're nowhere near alone. Google 'iOS 8.1 wifi' and you'll see tons of people complaining about it all over the place.  Was at my uncle Bob's a couple weeks ago and set up for his wifi and had no issues. That was with 8.0.2 installed. The 8.1 update comes out in between visits and when I go back again I am surprised that I'm not connected to his wifi. "Your router down?" Nope. Other devices using it right now. Wtf? Restart iPhone. See it now. But can't get on. Wtf? Forget network. Add network. Can't get on. Restart router and phone at same time. Wtf, why can I get on now?  ISP's ADSL/router at the warehouse at work used to work great from anywhere in the warehouse until the 8.1 update was installed. Now I have to be within about 30 feet of the stupid thing. Aggravating.
Its the closest we'll ever get to a SCP movie
This article is a joke.  It's called an "Alford plea" not an "Alfred deal." 
I think it's awareness. 
Super late here, but: http://ceschi.bandcamp.com/ https://www.facebook.com/ceschiramos His songs are mostly either folk or hip-hop but still pretty rad. Pat and him just finished recording a split together  
A youtuber from a different niche. Not a gamer and not related to the creatures so I just added that part in for those aware of that situation.
Extreme double standards may as well be one of the core tenets of being an SJW. That's why it's such a militant world view. Everything on 'your side' basically can do no wrong. While the other side's wrongs are to be magnified and complained about endlessly. The reason why it's impossible to find SJWs who own up to their mistakes or wrongdoing is because their world view basically forbids tattling on their own. Basically everything spirals back to how they're the victims and you're the oppressor/offender. Spin that situation around and admit to the opposite, and suddenly you aren't a 'warrior' for the cause. You're suddenly not an SJW at that point. A fairminded, factual viewpoint clashes hard against moral dogma.
I'd be happy to help out.
Let's go preds! I'm doing fall festival stuff so I probably won't be watching the game, but I will be in here. 
You don't close profitable businesses.
Always, dude... *always*.
Nutella and tortilla chips is tasty.
iPhone 6 Plus (w/JB) or Nexus 6
Man, I had to look up when Cheers was on... I can't believe it started in 1982! I didn't realize it was THAT old!
Well this dont counts....because he is a men, that means he wants it. Only if womans get this its a problem.
Depends what you're looking for. I had a penpal who lived half the world away who I ended up talking to for about 6 months. There wasn't a chance in hell I'd ever meet up irl but it was nice to practice not scaring someone off with my personality
Spilled. Ftfy.
If you love great stories from anthology movies, the final one, Amelia can't be missed. It's a classic.
Leave the first P, man.
This episode always left me with a bad taste in my mouth. I love it- its a great episode. However, i never liked how he got forever separated from his cartoon world. 
More people should understand that it isn't about sexist men hating on women, it's about their creative lacking in writing women.
I'd pay 5 bucks for that game, where did you get it for that cheap? :0
The my little pony? :O
If you have any of the knobs, I'd consider casting as lucid_walker discussed above. 
NeoQuest II!! I love that game. Got my bronze trophy years ago on my 'gaming account' but then my other, older main account got chain frozen because a group of elitist restockers got upset and mass reported that account (since I had been using a new account to RS til I realized I still had access to the iced account and was really happy, halting RSing on the new one and was planning to RS on the older account). :/ 
This was my initial idea, but unfortunately I could not achive steady 60 while recording. The game itself runs perfectly smooth in Blighttown, rarely dropping below 50. 
I own one and it's getting annoying on this sub.
Zhu Li: #IwillMurderAllThatYouLove #IhopeSenpaiNoticesMe
Hmmm as a Muslim you just gave me an idea. 
Does anyone think there might be *too* much voodoo on this team? [If so](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=x2bOXQibamM#t=11)
Vivienne Pinay and Honey Mahoganys lipsync.
I'll hit you up. :) would you be interested in joining a ranked team?
They were good.  Until they moved manufacturing to China.
Who cares if you didn't participate? It's not really any of their business whether you do or do not participate in Halloween. 
That is the most surprising vagina.
Hi I deposited a lvl 1 female sneasel for seismitoad. Ign is Justin!
I think I might pass, my buddy said he'll borrow me Ryse. Thanks for the offer though.
Well... I-594's second largest donor (responsible for about 15% of the initiative's funding) did write an article about his fear of an uprising against the rich due to wealth inequality. It would make sense to disarm the public if that was a concern.  http://www.politico.com/magazine/story/2014/06/the-pitchforks-are-coming-for-us-plutocrats-108014.html
Apocalypse, Fuck yeah! 
Oh well. Thanks for the info!
We do that. What we don't do is blow these things out of proportion. We don't confuse criticism with harassment. We don't publicize details of credible threats, because that is not What You Do according to the authorities.  Milo received a syringe in the mail. KingofPol received a knife, and both him and Cernovich had the authorities falsely called to their address. Boogie was told someone will kill his wife in his sleep (or something to that effect.) These were one-time reported events, not massive media platforms with Patreon links.
I invented Jamaican Bagpipe Metal.
As someone who got into CS with CS:GO, I can also confirm that 1.6 is a lot better mechanically. When I join a 1.6 server the raw skill I have that CS:GO doesn't let you really express comes out.   But that definitely doesn't mean CS:GO is inferior, if you're trying to imply that. 
Just a friendly reminder to the people on this sub who do this stuff, just because you don't agree with someone's opinion doesn't mean you downvote them, 
Same
You'd think we'd be used to it.
We never had flushing toilets for the entirety of human history; look at us now.
Will it play games better than a potato?
Fucking brainwashing adults spawning fucking brainwashed little shits are the most insidious result of all the anti-birth control, anti-abortion, anti-sex ed, anti-learning, sex-shaming, primitive bigotry associated with religion.  All they want is to spawn endless, countless masses of equally ignorant pieces of shit.  It is like that asshole king from the movie Braveheart; "...We'll breed them out..."  Fucking primitives, all of them; any religion.
Apparently in PA and NJ.
Arvada, co 676
It's been quite a while since you posted, but if you're still interested, please tell about the fentanyl marketing scheme!
/r/emptylife
